CLASS 1 Start Here - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=H5V2Bn2wkAM

Transcript:
(00:00) What's going on everyone? Welcome. My name is Alex Fromoszi. I'm the CEO of acquisition.com. And in this video, what I want to do is show you how I turned $1,36 into $112 million in revenue over 44 months using unique acquisition frameworks. This is going to be the introduction to a long series of courses that I'm giving away for free.
(00:20) And I'm doing that because I want to help everyone who's under $3 million a year just get there. And so my transparent intention is to give you more value than you'd be getting from your quote high ticket courses and coaching programs uh and do it absolutely free. And it's because Kindly I don't need the money and because this is something that I'm really passionate about.
(00:39) And so I built the studio, I built all the stuff um just for this process for you. So once I obviously had, you know, got started, I was able to double down again and again using these acquisition frameworks I'm going to share with you. and ended up spending 3.1 million and getting a total lifetime return of 36 to1 on advertising.
(00:57) So these are these are practices that I've done myself that I have I have lived firsthand and I know that they work and so I just want to be able to share those with you. I would share these one-on-one and this is what I do with our portfolio companies but since I can only work with companies that you know that are doing a minimum of 3 to 10 million a year that that work with us, this is just for everyone else uh to be able to learn for free.
(01:18) All right. So, I built Gym Launch from 0 to 2.4 million a month in 18 months. Uh, Prestige from uh 0 to $1.7 million. That's an e-commerce brand. Allen is our software company from 0 to 1.4 million in 6 months. And that's per month each of those numbers. So, 2.4 million a month, 1.7 million, 1.4, and then uh 40,000 to 700,000 was one of our acquisitions to $700,000 a month in a short 10 months.
(01:43) All right? And that was brick and mortar. So you can see this across different one was licensing, one was physical products, uh one was software and the other is brick and mortar chain in photography. So very different types of businesses but the frameworks work all the same. All right. And so like I said earlier, we take three to$10 million companies at minimum in that in that range.
(02:02) Obviously higher, but at minimum in that range with the goal to exit in three to five years. My my point for all of these videos is to give you the help you make your first dollar, your first million, your second million dollar. What I do with companies is I help them make their last dollar they'll ever need to make and that's kind of my whole thing.
(02:17) So if you're less than three million right now then this is all for you. Enjoy it for free. I have nothing to sell you. So enjoy. All right. So the offer how to make offers so good people feel stupid saying no. The reason I started with offers over anything else is that before we can get into traffic, before we can get into, you know, generating leads, you know, making sales, all that stuff, you have to literally initiate a transaction with a customer, which is an offer, which is what you're going to exchange in value with them to get them to pay,
(02:41) right? So, to catch fish, you need bait or an offer. All right? And so, that is the starting point of a conversation to initiate a transaction. What you literally give them in exchange for their money. So, right now, if you have, you know, if your ads don't convert well or you're not getting new customers or your sales team or your salesperson or it's you has trouble scaling or it takes too long to ramp up new reps or or you're just not getting people to say yes, many times the offer is the issue, right? And so, the reason this is
(03:08) important is that the offer is going to be the number one driver of success in any campaign. So, what does it do? Right? It will allow you to sell in a vacuum or a category of one and force customers to make value based decisions instead of price based decisions. This is the key point of why an offer is so important.
(03:24) All right? When when people look when customers look at the marketplace, when they're trying to solve a problem, they're going to look at the different offers that exist, right? And if you can position your offer in such a way that they are not going to compare you um your price, right, because they can't because you've made your offer so unique, right? In so doing, you become a category of one and then you're no longer constrained by pricing whatsoever, right? And so by doing that, you're able to sell in a way that's completely onetoone so that you
(03:52) don't have to compete with anyone else. And that will protect your margin. It will give you a lot a host of competitive advantages that are enduring. All right? And so the goal of of fixing your offer or improving your offer is to decommoditize what you sell. Now, the end result of that is you'll have higher CTR, so clickthrough rates on your ads because your offer is better.
(04:12) You'll have a higher amount of those people who will convert and say yes to working with you because the offer is better. and they'll be able to say yes at higher prices. And so you combine those things together, you have a higher percentage of eyeballs who say yes, I'm interested. A higher percentage of those people that is already a greater number saying yes, I want to buy and doing so at higher prices.
(04:30) And so I'm going to show you a couple real world examples of what we've done here. And so the translation for for normal language is more leads, more sales at higher prices and higher profits. Okay, so here's two two real life examples. One is a BTOC weight loss example. This is a really classic one.
(04:45) And this was um this is what we did in our licensing company a few years ago and it really transformed the industry. So the typical, you know, independent owner of a of a a boot camp or any kind of independent facility. You know, they were charging $99 a month for for large group training. And the problem with that is that it's highly commoditized, right? There's a ton of people who are offering the same thing for the same price.
(05:05) And again, this is the point here. People are going to look around and say, "Well, you know, this place is closer to me and maybe this one's, you know, $10 more." And then they just basically look and say, "Are these equivalent?" yes, then I will take the cheaper one, right? And that's horrible and embarrassing and you don't want that to happen.
(05:20) So what we did is we switched our offer to a free sixe challenge. And so the the components of that offer were fairly simple, right? Instead of selling, you know, a membership package, we would sell a defined end program, which was in this case, you know, you'll lose 20 pounds in six weeks or um uh and if you don't lose it, sorry, if you do lose it, you get all of your money back, right? Which is pretty cool and compelling, right? It's like betting on yourself.
(05:42) And so people thought that was a really cool offer, too. And so people would pay $600 and then get a host of other things that you wouldn't normally be able to get at a boot camp or large group training facility. You'd have an accountability coach. You'd have a nutrition coach. You'd have meal plans, grocery list, fruit preparation instructions, eating out guides, all of the things that all of these extra pieces uh that would make it amazing.
(06:00) And then on top of that, there was a satisfaction guarantee that even if you didn't hit the goal, if you didn't think you got $600 worth of value during that period of time, they would give you the money back. All right? Really compelling offer, right? And so as a result of that, a lot of people wanted it.
(06:13) And so because it was free, more people clicked. Because the offer was so good, more people bought. And as a result of that, instead of getting $99 on these people, we got $600 plus. And then there were multiple upsells on top of that. And so this literally transformed what most people were doing to break even on their acquisition or lose money getting new customers to making 30 to one upfront.
(06:32) All right? That doesn't even include the recurring or back end. 30 to one. That means if you put $1,000 into marketing, you made $30,000 in that first 30 days. That is the power of changing the offer. All right, the core services were the same. And this is the key point here is that in your business, we don't need to change what you're doing.
(06:48) We need to change how you're presenting what you're doing. And that's what this whole training is about. All right. So, here's a second one. This is a B2B agency example. So, I want B to C as in business to consumer. And B2B is businessto business. So, you're selling uh you know, business services. So, this is an agency example.
(07:04) So, if you, you know, a classic lead generation to small business owner, you know, if you're serving chiropractors, you're serving uh you're serving plumbers, you're serving roofers, you're serving whatever, right? A classic example would be like a $1,500 a month retainer, right? That's that's a normal example, but what we did is, and that's very commoditized, which is why it's very difficult for most people to make money doing that, right? And we switched that to pay me once, then only pay me when someone shows up, right? So,
(07:28) you pay me one time, we get you set up, and then from that point going forward, the only money you ever pay me is if I get someone to show up at your business. All right, so let me show you the difference of what happened for, and this is our customers. All right, this isn't this isn't um this isn't me doing this. This was agencies we worked with.
(07:43) All right, they went from 0.5 to one return on advertising in their first 30 days, meaning they spent $1,000 to get $500 back or they spent $5,000, got $2,500 back, but then they had the recurring so they can get up the next month. Right? That's a normal business with normal returns. The difficulty is it's very, you know, it's hard to scale that u profitably unless you have a lot of money, right? Which many people don't.
(08:03) And so once we made this transition to a paper performance model, uh they went from 0.5 to one to 11:1 return. That means they put $1,000 in, they got $11,000 back before they have the continuity that kicks in. This is the power of changing the offer. Now, you'll notice that these are different offers altogether. This one is a performance offer with an implied guarantee.
(08:21) This one had a this one had two guarantees. It had conditional and a and an unconditional guarantee. and it had a stack of bonuses with some urgency. And I'm going to show you kind of how to put these pieces together. All right, so real quick because I like showing the math behind this stuff. The first offer that I told you, these were the numbers behind that offer.
(08:36) You know, they spent $10,000. This is the the data we collected. 300,000 impressions. The response rate was 00013. They were booking 40 appointment rate was 75%. You can see the math all the way down here. And that's what resulted in 0.5 to one. Now, as soon as we made the change, we got two and a half times the response rate.
(08:54) All right, that's key point number one. Two and a half times as many people who saw the ads with that offer responded. All right, now from there, that obviously two and a halfx the results. All that stuff was unchanged. Just two and a halfx flow flowed through. The second big point um of improvement was on the closing percentage.
(09:11) They closed 2.3 times more people, all right, than they were before on their typical model. All right. And here's what's crazy is that we actually quadrupled the price for these agencies. All right. So, a lot of them were charging $1,000 or $1,500 upfront, but they were able to charge $4,000 upfront.
(09:28) All right? So, they had two and a half two and a half times the response rate, 2.3 times the close rate, and then four times the price. And so, what that resulted in was 22.4 times more cash collected up front. All right? So, if they spent 10,000, they made 5,000 the first time, when they made this grand slam offer, which is what we call an offer that takes all the components put together, they made $112,000 off that same $10,000 in ad spend. All right? And they went from 0.
(09:53) 5 to one to 11.2 to1. And so, the end result here is they got paid to get new customers. And that is the point, right? If you can get paid to get new customers, then marketing budgets disappear and it all becomes about scaling your operational, you know, bottlenecks. it no longer becomes acquisition.
(10:10) Acquisition is no longer the bottleneck. And ultimately, what's interesting for me is that with the companies that I work with, I'm almost never talking about acquisition because we fix the acquisition problem so quickly that the remainder of our time is building out the operational scale and infrastructure of the business. So, you might think, Alex, that's neat, but how do I actually do that? That is the purpose of uh all the courses and and trainings I'm putting together for you.
(10:31) All right. So, there's nine components that we've kind of identified. There's a book that's coming out uh and probably if you're watching this it may already be up that that goes into all of these factors in more depth. I think it's free or at cost. It's probably you know between$1 and $10 wherever you buy it.
(10:45) Don't quote me. Maybe it's 20 or maybe I changed my mind and made it a thousand but probably probably a dollar. So number one is you want to have the right market. All right. So I call it the starving crowd. So there's three components of that. There's four factors and three main markets and then how to niche that I'm going to cover.
(10:58) Charging what it's worth. So I'm going talk about pricing. The next part of the offer is going to be the value equation. So, it's understanding how to create more value in in the actual thing that you're selling itself. And it's really just repackaging the things you're already doing in new ways. All right. Beyond that, it's be creating the grand slime offer part one, which is actually defining out their outcome, figuring out the problems, and figuring out the solutions that you're going to provide to those problems. The second part is
(11:19) going to be this sales to fulfillment uh continuum, which is ultimately, you know, you you could I could work oneonone with every single person, but it'd be very difficult to fulfill. So the question is how do we mix these parts so we can make it a scalable model, a scalable offering that's still going to provide tons and tons of value to them.
(11:35) All right, next we'll have scarcity and urgency. So this is basically how we how we decrease the decision-making period for the prospect to get them to buy faster. There are ethical ways to do this that we've used over and over again that work very very well. And I'll show you both of those because scarcity urgency are different. Often times they're treated the same, but they are not the same.
(11:50) And I'll show you the the delineations between those seven as I'll show you the bonuses. So, there's 11 bullet points that we do when we're considering bonuses and stacking offers. And I'll show you how what we look into those things. Eight, I'll show you the different types of guarantees. I think I'll show you 13 different guarantee structures off of two main one, which is conditional and unconditional guarantees and how to stack those uh guarantees together to virtually eliminate risk for your prospect. And then finally, uh the magic
(12:12) naming formula. And the reason this is important is because one, if you're in a in a local market or in a smaller market or niche, you'll oftentimes need to change the naming around your core product or your or your promotions uh in a way that gets your avatars or your prospects to want to move towards you and know that what you have is for them, right? And so there's ways of naming things that will increase response rates.
(12:33) There's ways of naming things that will increase the value that they're going to perceive from your product. And I'm going to break down each of those things for you. Okay? So, uh, that that that concludes our our introduction to this entire section. These are the nine components of the offer. Starving crowd, charging what it's worth, getting the value right, understanding how you're going to break down the problems, understand how you're going to fulfill those problems, scarcity, urgency, bonuses, guarantee, and actually how to name it. So, really
(12:55) excited to get dive in with these. This is some of the I'm just I'm just very excited. So, uh, hope you are, too. Buckle up. It's going to be a fun ride and I'll see you in the next

CLASS 2 Picking Markets - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0wKg72jPhCE

Transcript:
(00:00) What's going on everyone? My name is Alex Shamoszi. I'm the CEO of acquisition.com. We hold a portfolio of companies and we work with three to$10 million companies to help them at minimum uh 3 to 10 million to help them scale and exit uh in 3 to 5 years so that they never have to make another dollar again.
(00:16) The reason for this training is for everyone who's less than $3 million a year. I want to help you get there so that maybe someday we could work together. And at the very least, I just want to provide you value. So the first component of figuring out whether or not your, you know, your stuff is converting is understanding who you're talking to.
(00:31) And so the first part of this is starving crowd. And this is a number of trainings that I'm putting together for everyone that's available on acquisition.com. You can go there and get all the trainings for free. All right. So let's dive into this puppy. So the offer that you have might not be converting because you might be in the wrong market.
(00:45) So you might have a great market, sorry, great offer, but you just put in the wrong market. So this is kind of the first thing we have to look at in a business, right, that I'm that I'm working with. So here's exactly how you pick the right market. There's four pieces of this. One is the levers of success.
(00:57) These are the things that are going to make you uh make or break you uh in this process. The next is the four variables that I look at when I'm picking a market to say whether I want to get into this business or I want to get into this market or not. The third is three main markets that exist and how to find your submarket within those.
(01:11) And then finally the riches are in the niches which is uh why niching is so important especially if you're uh you know below three million or or really even below 10 million. Why niching is so important for you to be successful. All right. So, let's start with the three levers of success. So, there's there's three pieces to this that will make you successful.
(01:29) And the first one is the most important. And then if this one checks off, we go to the second one. If that one checks off, you go to the third one. And so, the first is the actual market itself. And what I mean by that is if I'm uh if you know if you're selling if you're selling toilet paper during COVID, then you're you're probably don't have to have any other skills besides actually just having toilet paper.
(01:47) It was kind of like when masks exploded at the beginning of COVID. like if you just had them, you were going to sell out, right? And so there are markets that are like that where the demand to supply curve is so one-sided that it doesn't really take anything to be successful besides having a pulse right now. Most of us are not in one of these markets, but if you are, then kudos and just, you know, stop the video right now and keep doing what you're doing.
(02:05) But it's good to at least understand the different dynamics between marketplaces. And so the way I see each of these three variables is you have like a plus, a neutral, or a negative. As long as you're either uh a plus or a neutral, then you can move on to the next part of this equation. All right, which is going to be your offer itself, right? So, as long as we're in at least a normal marketplace, which I define as just something that's growing at the same paces as the economy, you know, you know, or the population, excuse me. Um, as long as it's growing
(02:30) at the same pace as the population, then I know that this is this is a normal marketplace. And I want to be candid with you, all of the money I've made in my entire life has been in a normal marketplace. I've never had a gang busters crazy marketplace. I wish I I could, and when I you know, if you see one of those opportunities, definitely jump onto it.
(02:46) Uh, but for me, it's always been in the normal market places. I just try to avoid marketplaces that are dying, right? And I'll give you some examples of those in a second. All right, but with the offer itself is, okay, we're in a normal marketplace, but if we're not if we're not getting sales, then it might be the offer itself is not very good.
(03:01) All right, and again here, if you have a great offer, you could stop here and nothing else would matter. If you have an amazing offer, that's it. You can crush it right now. If you have a normal offer, then it goes to the next part of the equation. If you have a terrible offer, then you'll then then you probably won't be successful at all.
(03:13) All right? And so the third piece of this that's the least important is going to be your ability to persuade, right? And the only reason that you would need to be really good at persuasion is if you're in a normal market and you have a normal or subpar offer, you have to be exceptional at persuasion, right? And so there have been empires that have been built off of amazing influencers and persuaders.
(03:32) Um, but you have to have that. And so for me, if I'm working with a business, I'm going to look at these first two parts of the equation first, which is can we find something that's growing and interesting, right? Can we make an offer that's really compelling so that we don't have to develop some of these skills that take a long time to develop, right? Obviously, if you get better at persuading, all these things work better, too.
(03:48) But at the very least, like a good persuader in a in a terrible market is not going to be a bad persuader in a great market. All right? Markets usually win. All right? So, those are the three levers of success just to set the the context and the frame for what we're going to go into. So, these are the four variables that I look at when I'm when I'm picking a marketplace.
(04:06) The first is that the customers have to be an absolute pain, right? I don't want something I don't want something that's, you know, just convenient or a nice to have. I want something that they absolutely desperately need. All right? As an example, if I were, you know, selling hot dogs at, you know, right at at 2 a.m.
(04:22) as the bars let out in a college town, I'm probably going to do pretty well, right? I've got a starving crowd, quite literally. All right. The next thing I'm looking at is purchasing power, which is, you know, do these do these people that I'm that I'm looking to sell to, do they have money? Uh, I had a good friend of mine was really really good at proving resumes, right? And so he made this offer, it was a really good offer to job seekers.
(04:44) And so it was people who are unemployed. What he what he found out soon was he's like, "No one can afford my services." And it was just kind of ironic because that's, you know, who he's going after. Not to say that the unemployment market is something that you couldn't go after. It's just that at least the way that he was approaching and where he was finding them, those people were all on unemployment, didn't have any money, and so they couldn't afford his services.
(05:02) And so that's why the second thing that I look at is purchasing power. Do these people have money? Right? Third is are they easy to target? Right? Because it's great, it's great to have uh, you know, an avatar that you're going after, but if I don't have a way to easily target them on a platform or they have associations they belong to or lists that I can rent or you know, other people who already aggregated these these pools of attention together, then it's going to be really difficult to market to them. Like for example, if I'm
(05:24) trying to market to doctors and only way that I have to reach people is nurses, well then my offer is going to fall on deaf ears and it's not going to work, right? I'm not to say that that's that's just an example. There's obviously really easy ways to target doctors, but you just need to know how to target those people.
(05:38) And if I can't target them, I don't pick that. I don't go after that market. All right? And then finally is I want something that's growing. All right? So, a good friend of mine owned a company, actually still owns a company that was a software company that provided advertising services to newspapers, local newspapers.
(05:55) And the problem, and it's so funny because he's such a good entrepreneur. He's crazy good entrepreneur. And he he he called me up and he was like, "Hey man, like I I can't figure out why this isn't working, right?" He had a really good offer. It was a performance-based offer. It was zero down. It was a rev share based on the revenue he made.
(06:10) I mean, super easy offer to sell all of these things. and he had a good he had a good revenue model behind it. But the problem was just the big obvious thing and that's why sometimes it's good to have outside advisors or other people to just bounce things off of which is like dude you're you're selling newspapers and just so you guys know newspapers shrink at 25% annually for the last nine years.
(06:29) 25% that's compounding. So it's literally reverse like terrible terrible shrinkage in the marketplace. U that means it cuts in half every like three years which is really not good. So even if he were growing at at 25% a year, he would literally only be staying the same because he has to combat the fact that the marketplace is shrinking.
(06:47) All right? And so those are the four components. One is the pain. I want to make sure that they desperately want what I have. Two, they have the money to afford it. Three, I can find them easily and that they are growing. And so that is what I'm going to look at. And if I can't find one of those things, I'm going to try and something try and find a place or a market that that meets all four of those variables. All right.
(07:05) So we have the three levers success. As long as we're we realize the market is the most important part, offer is the second most important part. These are the four variables that I do to pick a market. And then you're like, okay, well, what market exist? All right, so there's three main markets, right? You've got health, wealth, and relationships.
(07:20) And if you think about those, that's kind of like the three core problems of the human condition, right? Uh you know, we want to have money, we want to be loved, and we want to have we want to be healthy, right? Those are kind of the three big things. Now, when you look at those markets, those are the main markets.
(07:33) All right? Everything kind of exists within one of those three buckets. If you think about it, that's that's just about everything that's out there, right? And so what what you want to do is you want to solve a you want to help a unique avatar solve a specific problem in a unique way that reverses their biggest objection. And so that's how I like to think about it is I want I'll say it again.
(07:52) I help a unique avatar, so a very specific person solve a very specific problem in a unique way that overcomes their biggest objection or worry. All right? And so by doing that, we are positioned in a unique way in their mind. and they're like, "Oh, well that's this is for me." Cuz they're going to hear that it's about them and it solves this very specific thing that I know that I understand.
(08:11) But wait, is it going to be one of those? No, they do it in a unique way that solves my objection, right? And you can think about how that works from a persuasive standpoint. Now, within each of these markets are submarkets, right? So within wealth, you know, you could be helping people find real estate investments, you could help people with the stock market, you could help people advertise, you could help people build sales teams, you could help people create offers, you could help people do a variety of things that are going to ultimately make them
(08:32) more money. All right? Um, you know, within health, it could be, you know, you help people through nutrition- based, uh, interventions, you could help, and that's obviously just one subbet. You would have tons of subbuckets underneath that. You've got keto, intermittent fasting, you know, Weight Watchers with the number system, nutri meals that get sent to them.
(08:48) There's all these different ways of solving the same problem, right? Which often times all we need to do is just re repackage what they're already doing so that we can ultimately sell stuff. All right? Now, oops, I'll go back there real quick. When we're looking at this, wealth is going to be B to B and B TOC.
(09:06) So, B TOC wealth would be uh targeting normal consumers and helping them make money. So that might be a new business opportunity or might be a job opportunity or learning a skill that allows them to get a higher paying job that is that would be considered wealth for a B toC. B2B is targeting existing businesses and trying to make them more money from their from their existing you know business right that's market like anything that's marketing related anything you know even IT services indirectly is is is wealthreated right
(09:33) because what you're doing is you're indirectly improving you know their backend system so that they can make more money right so when we're thinking about this it's like the what's the so that they can right we're doing this so that they can make more money we're going to do this relationship stuff so that they can have more love and not feel alone right and Then health again is B TOC.
(09:53) So most health products with the exception of like corporate fitness is going to be B toC. Almost all relationship stuff you're not selling relationship stuff to businesses except you know because even if you sell anything to a business that was like hey we'll help the founders talk to each other better communication that's still going to fall under wealth because it's going to make them more money right and so these are the three larger markets.
(10:10) You need to find your subm market underneath of that which is going to be your unique way of targeting a specific avatar uh solving a specific problem of theirs in a unique way that solves their biggest obstacle. All right. So, those are the three main markets and how to look for your submarket. All right.
(10:25) Now, the reason that the subm market is so important is this fourth point, which is that the riches are in the niches. And I'm going to I'm going to explain this with a visual that I first heard from Dan Kennedy and it was really just eye opening for me. It really changed my life. And so, I'll share it with you right now.
(10:37) And uh if you like more of this stuff, by the way, uh I'll just pause. You can go to acquisition.com. I have free trainings. I'm continuing to release more books and courses on this stuff for you guys at cost because I just want people to be wealthy and successful. And you know, my my very transparent goal is that you build your business from nothing to $3 million a year, and then you call me up and say, "Hey, I used all your free stuff.
(10:53) I didn't have to buy anyone's stuff." And uh I was successful and I want to go to 30 million. And then I'd be happy to take the call. So, what do we have here? So, we've got you've got your product, you've got your price, and I want to show you what this looks like. So, let's say that you had a generic time management course.
(11:06) All right, this is going to really drive this point home for you. Let's say you had a generic time management course. And let's be honest, if you were at Barnes & Nobles and you're looking at time management course, it might sell for, you know, 19 bucks, right? just a normal just a thing or a booklet on on time management, right? Very straightforward.
(11:21) All right? And that's because it targets everyone, right? And so as a result, there's no unique avatar. There's no unique process in it whatsoever. It's just generic. And so that is why it has to be priced this way, right? Now, let's say that we then took the same course and just changed the language inside of the course.
(11:37) Same core thing, right? And we changed it to time management for sales professionals. All right. Ah, this is much more interesting now. And in our sales messaging, we can talk about uh more specifically the problems it's going to solve for them in the actual product itself. We can talk about, you know, hey, this is going to help you make one more sale or two more sales just by being more efficient with your time.
(11:56) All of a sudden, now this is the same course more or less, just now sold for $99. Huh, that's cool. Now, let's look at the next one. Let's say we we niche down even further, right? We say time management for outbound B2B sales. Huh? Well, if I'm an outbound B2B sales rep, I'm like, "Wow, this is really specific for me. It's 500 bucks.
(12:15) I mean, I would consider this. I mean, I mean, I do one deal and I'm going to I'm going to make this money back, right? And so, I'm definitely going to get my ROI on this thing, right? But notice we've already gone from $19 to $500. And this is already just the main course. But let's just see how how much further we can even take this thing.
(12:30) So, let's say I I had a course. It was time manage for outbound B2B power tools and gardening sales reps. All right? And I could sell this for $2,000. Because think about this. If you were an outbound B2B sales rep for power tools and gardening, right, you'd be like, "This thing is literally made just for me." Like, there's nothing else on the market that's like this category of one.
(12:52) And a as a result, it's going to be made specifically for me and solve my problems in a unique way that'll overcome my biggest obstacles that they know because that is who I am, right? And so, we went from a $19 price to a 1997 price as in $2,000. All right? And so we literally just 100xed the price of the product that we have simply by niching down.
(13:16) And that is why they say the riches are in the niches. All right? That's why this is so important. And from a selling perspective, it also makes it significantly easier because the messaging and your copy and your advertising, all that stuff is going to be is going to be specific to that avatar. All right? And so same product 100 times the price.
(13:31) That is the power of niching. All right? And so the reason, like I said, it's so profitable, you can be so specific. All right? And so I like to say this because I think this is a nice sound bite that you can always remember is that the goal of great writing is for the reader to understand. The goal of great copy is for the prospect to feel understood.
(13:48) That's the difference. We're not when you're trying to persuade, you're not trying to teach. You're trying to get them to feel understood. Because the better you can articulate their situation and their problems. And if you can say what they are suffering from better than they can, then they will automatically believe that if you can articulate their problems better, you can also articulate the solutions to their problems better than they probably have thought of.
(14:12) And as a result, you will be an expert at solving their problem and justify the price that is probably significantly more because it's made specifically for them. All right, so that is the power of niching down and why it's so important. So, if right now your your offer is not converting, it may be because you're not in the right market.
(14:31) And so, one, the three levers of success, we went over that. Uh, two, we went over the four variables that I look at when I'm picking a market. So, I want them to be in pain. I want them to have purchasing power. I want them to be easy to find, and I want them to be growing. The three main markets that exist, and you have to find a submarket, which is going to be health, wealth, and relationships.
(14:46) Right? Overall, there's going to be the the three bigger ones. And then we need to do that subm market and really niche down because it's going to allow us to be competing in a category of one. All right? Realistically, if you're trying to compete against mass market, there are massive, massive, massive companies that already exist there and occupy that space.
(15:01) It's very difficult to dethrone them, right? Whereas, if you can niche down, niche down, niche down, then it would be easier for you to make a compelling argument that you can solve this specific person's problem better than a generic solution, a commoditized solution. And as a result, you'll be able to spend more targeted ad dollars, more specific ways of reaching out to customers with specific messaging at higher price points and make a good profit and build a business around it.
(15:22) All right, so those are the four things that I look at when I'm as as step number one is finding a starving crowd. All right, and so in the next video, what I'm going to do is I'm going to show you how to charge what it's worth. All right, so I'm going to go through that in the next video. I hope you enjoyed this. Go ahead acquisition.
(15:36) com if you want more free stuff. It's all there for you. Keep being awesome. and I'll see you in the next video.

CLASS 3 Charge Its Worth - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=miDtUqW5JI8

Transcript:
(00:00) What's going on everyone? It's Alex Shamuzer here, founder and CEO of Acquisition.com. We own a portfolio of companies. Uh we work with companies that are between at minimum $3 to $10 million a year in revenue and we help them scale and exit in 3 to 5 years so that they never have to make another dollar again.
(00:14) You should only have to get rich once. So that's our saying for everyone else who's below $3 million or $10 million in revenue. Then I am making all of these trainings for free to hopefully get you to that point so that we could potentially work together. And at the very least, if you're not there, then just enjoy it for free.
(00:28) I just want everyone to be wealthy. And I mean that genuinely. And so the second component, so this is uh the second component of creating offers that will that will convert and make you money. All right? And so this is what helped us, you know, do 120 120 I think at this point million in sales across lots of entities that we have.
(00:45) And so it's charging what it's worth. And so my last video talked about finding a starving crowd, which you can find at acquisition.com. But this one is uh and that's under the the offers training. This is obviously offer number two, charging what it's worth. All right. So the offer might not be converting first because you might be in the wrong market, but it might also not be converting if you're in the right market because you might be in the wrong price.
(01:03) All right? So this is a really important component of making something make money, right? If you charge nothing for something, then you probably won't make money from it. All right? And so here's how to pick the right price. Okay? So there's there's a few components to this. One is going to be the price to value discrepancy. So it's understanding how that even works altogether.
(01:18) The next is going to be the virtual cycle of pricing which is one of my favorite concepts to break down for people because it was a huge belief breaker for me in my life and then understanding the correlation between pricing and and perceived value. All right, so let's start with the price to value discrepancy. Okay, so I have this uh little graph here and the reason that that this is so important to understand is that whenever you have services or products or anything whatsoever, people inherently buy because they believe that what they're getting in value is
(01:45) superior to price. Right? This is this is how people make purchasing decisions, right? And the thing is is they will continue to buy from you as long as this discrepancy between price and value exists, right? Here's the price, here's the value. All right? And so, as long as value stays above the price, then they're happy, right? Now, here's the thing, and this is where you you stop getting customers or people, you know, bought from you once and they don't want to buy from you again, is the moment that that value dips below or matches
(02:10) your price, then that is the point of cancellation or the point of no return. So, if you're in a recurring revenue business, it would be a point of cancellation. if you're if you're selling physical products or or onetime services, then they they're not going to refer people and they're not going to want to do business with you again, right? And the thing is is that most businesses, believe it or not, are actually below this line.
(02:26) Uh and so they're really only able to make one sale per customer and they can never make another uh sale again, which massively impacts the business. That's why most businesses don't make money. They're they always have to find new customers because their existing product isn't that good. And I'm going to be really honest with you for a second.
(02:41) So many times I talk to business owners and they're like, "We're so good at what we do, we just can't find customers." The reality is that you probably aren't that good. You're probably mediocre. You're probably average. And the thing is is that average puts you here or below. And in order to get repeat business, you can't just be like above average.
(02:54) You need to be exceptional. You need to be remarkable. You need to be so good that people talk about you. And that's difficult to do. And that's why most people don't make money. And that's okay. And that's why you're here and you're learning and getting better. All right. So price to value discrepancy. Understanding this concept in terms of how much value you need to provide is going to be key to making sure that our pricing works.
(03:12) So there's two ways to improve this discrepancy. One is you can lower your price, right? Which is a one way ticket to failure. The other way is to increase your value. All right? Which is always the way that when I'm working with a business, this is what I'm trying to do is I'm trying to figure out ways to increase the value and more importantly the perceived value of the product or services to the customers and prospects so that they're more willing to pay uh a higher rate.
(03:34) And so part of that's going to be niching down. Part of that's going to be position the offer and reversing risk and all that kind of stuff, which we're going to get to in some of the in some of the future videos. All right? And so, like I said, number one is you can lower the price. Number two is you can raise the value, which is obviously the one that we want to go to.
(03:48) All right? So, let's go into that. All right? So, that's the hard way [laughter] and the easy way is to raise the value. All right? But remember, you can only go down to zero, but you can go infinitely high the other direction for value, which is one of the key points. And this was one I remember I was I was eating a burger when I was a kid when I was working at a smoothie shop and one of the co-workers that I had pulled me aside.
(04:07) He's like, "Dude, check this out." And he was reading a magazine cuz when magazines existed and he was like, "Look, this guy bought a $50,000 burger." And I was walking in with my burger from Next Door that I bought for 13 bucks, right? And he's like, "He paid $50,000 for a burger." And I remember thinking to myself, I was like, "How could somebody afford $50,000 for a burger? That's crazy.
(04:23) " And so I asked, I was like, "What does this guy do?" He's like, "Apparently some hedge fun guy, some finance guy." and he made I can't remember the number was but I think he made like 20 or or $30 million in a year which they they said in the article and the reason that this was so interesting to me was that I realized that you could go infinitely high in the other direction but you could only go down to zero because for me at the time believe it or not me buying a $13 burger on a $6.
(04:48) 75 hour wage was me giving two hours of my life in order to get that amount of money for him at $20 million a year he was making you know whatever it was $25,000 an hour whatever math is, right? Or it might he might have made 50. It doesn't matter. I remember he was making $25,000 an hour. And so it took him two hours of time to pay for this $50,000 burger and it took me two hours of time to pay for my $13 burger.
(05:07) And so that's when I realized that that purchase was actually equivalent for both of us. And so that's what showed me the power of pricing is that my god, there are some people who could who could go infinitely high in the other direction, but I can only go down to zero, right? And so that was a huge belief breaking moment for me in understanding price to value discrepancy.
(05:23) All right? And the goal is that they buy a tremendous amount of value at a discount. That is always the goal is that you're selling dollars at a discount. All right, dollars at a discount. That's the idea is we they they have to feel like their dollars are going to be the best return on their quote investment of spending their money that they've hardearned is going to be with you because they get so much more per dollar.
(05:42) Not how many dollars they spend, but per dollar they're going to get more than anywhere else. All right, so price to value discrepancy. The goal is to increase the value. That's why that's so important. All right, so number two is the virtuous cycle of price. So, this is what most people do when they're trying to decide on pricing for their business.
(05:58) They look at the marketplace. They see what else everyone else is offering. They take the average. They go slightly below to quote remain competitive. They provide whatever their competition offers with quote a little more and end up at a value proposition of more for less. This is what you don't want to do. This is what everyone does.
(06:11) This is why everyone's broke. So, stop looking at them. Every one of these competitors that you're looking at is poor. So, that's the big secret. I can tell you having spoken with so many business owners who look a certain way, who present a certain way, most people are broke. All right. So, don't model them. Don't copy them.
(06:25) Do something different. Do it on your own. Use your own brain. All right. So, this is what I consider the vicious cycle of price. All right? Because as you do this, all you have to do over time is you repeat step five and six. You try and provide a little bit more for a little bit less. A little bit more, a little bit less until eventually you're giving everything for nothing and you can't make money and you wonder why you aren't successful.
(06:42) All right. The point here is that when you price this way, you're pricing for market efficiency. All right. This is what you know they talk about in in perfect marketplaces and economics is the the the pricing for people who are not sophisticated competitors. They will continue to do this same process like I just said is probably to do a little bit more for a little bit less over and over and over again until eventually there's almost no profit left in the business.
(07:02) All right? And so that green is your profit. The red is the overhead because you you've been forced into this category of everyone which forces you to compete on price which drives you down which means pretty much everyone just goes out of business or stays just barely above water every month just barely keeping themselves above water and wondering when that corner that's going to come is going to and it never does because they can't do it better.
(07:24) They have to do it differently. So this is what the virtuous cycle of price looks like. All right. So virtuous versus vicious cycle. So for for your clients, if you decrease the price, you decrease their emotional investment. You decrease the perceived value of your product. You decrease their results because you decrease the price because they're not as invested.
(07:42) You increase the demandingness of these clients. I'll tell you the the people who pay you the least are the ones who are the biggest pain in the butt. And the revenue for fulfillment per customer goes down. So these are the this is the dangerous side of of the price. Now the virtuous side is if you increase your price, you increase their emotional investment, you increase their perceived value of what you do, by extension, you increase the results.
(08:01) uh you decrease the demandingness of the people that you have and you increase the revenue for fulfillment per customer. What I mean by that is that because they pay you more, you can literally spend more money to give them an exceptional experience and make sure they get the results they want, which increase their perceived value.
(08:14) And that is why this is a a virtuous cycle. This is a circle. I probably should draw it as a circle next time. I will do that. But it's a circle that self-fulfills. It's a flywheel, right? That's the beauty of virtuous pricing. Vicious is flywheel the wrong direction that's working against you. All right? But let me show you what this looks like for your business, right? So for your business, if you decrease your price, you decrease your profit.
(08:33) You decrease the pref your perceived value of self. You're like, man, I'm just a lowcost person. I'm not I'm not I'm not good. I don't believe in myself. That's why I have to lower my price. You decrease your perception of impact because you're not getting these people results. So then you start to question your own validity and your conviction starts to drop.
(08:48) You don't feel as confident in your ability to provide services and value because you continue to have to decrease your price. You're almost trying to feel like you try have to give away your services in order to be successful and still people don't want to buy them from you because you're not convicted because you on some level already know that you can't provide the level of service because you don't have any margin left over, right? Which goes to the next one which is the service levels, right? Your level of service decreases because you just have less
(09:06) money. You can't pay people. You can't attract better talent. And so it's a vicious cycle downwards and your sales team in of itself and that might be you or might be your team. They start to lose conviction in you and your services because of all the things that I just said.
(09:18) Right? Now let's put on the the flip side. If you can increase your price, right, you'll increase your profitability, right? You'll increase your perceived value of self. You're like, "Hey, we're a premium leader. We are the best at this." Which is a category of one. Your perception of impact will increase. You feel like your clients are getting better results from working with you.
(09:32) Your service levels will increase because you have excess money left over to reinvest in talent, reinvest in providing exceptional experience and your sales team or you are massively convicted because you know you're changing people's lives and making the impact that you always wanted to, which is why you started the business to begin with.
(09:45) And you may have made some of these mistakes up to this point, but that's okay because you can always change because that's the beauty of being our own bosses. We can always make the decisions. All right, so that is the virtual cycle of price and hopefully why I'm selling you right now on increasing pricing.
(09:57) But I'm going to give you one more real one of showing you why it's worth why you should charge what it's worth. All right? And it's that price in and of itself is a communication of value. Think about it. I'm going to give you a little a little example here. So this was a taste test. I'll cite the study somewhere, but for right now, this was a blind taste test that was done on three wines.
(10:17) Okay? And so they presented the tasters with a low price wine, a mediumric wine, and an expensive wine. All right? So they could see the price on the bottles right in front of them. They tasted them and they asked people to rate them in, you know, good, better, best, right? And so they said the the lowric one uh unsurprisingly was not as good.
(10:33) They said the medium one was medium and they said the higher price one was great. All right? Fairly standard. And a lot of us kind of come to that association. You know, good wines are more expensive and that's why they're that's why they're good. That's why they're more expensive, right? But here's what's interesting.
(10:46) All of those wines were actually the exact same wine just put in different bottles with different price tags on them. And so here's why this is so important. People literally perceived more value from the same product because the price was higher. So that means that you don't just charge higher prices because your product is better.
(11:06) Charging higher prices also makes your product better. Think about that for a second. Now, if you are the wine business owner of this of this particular bottle and you had a way of doing one thing that made you more money and increase the perception of your of your clients, believing that what you had was better, would you do it? Of course.
(11:28) Right? Why would you not get the the better result for your client? Right? Why would you want to sell the the bad wine when you could sell the great wine? Right? And it's the same exact wine. Why would you not do that? Of course you would. You didn't do it because you probably were afraid of what would happen.
(11:41) But I'm telling you, having done this with so many businesses, if you can increase the price, you'll increase the perception of value and people like it more. Warren Buffett, he took over Seas Candies, you know, 30, 40 years ago, whatever it was. He since made a billion dollars from this purchase that he bought for $24 million. All right.
(11:56) A billion dollars in net free cash flows, money that he took out of the business after reinvesting. And every single year what they've done is they've raised the prices at a higher rate than inflation. And so they've they've raised it by five six%. Every single year they raised the price and they found out that chocolates were actually fairly inelastic as in people would be willing to pay 40 $50 $60 for a box of chocolates, right? And when they started with them, they were, you know, not even close to that.
(12:20) But by doing this, they raised their profit. They raised the perceived quality of their product. And they did all of that simply by changing a number. How awesome is that? That's the beauty of the virtuous cycle of price. All right. So, the goal is to be so much more expensive that a consumer must pause and think this cannot be the same category of solution as everyone else is, thereby making you a category of one.
(12:42) This is how I always like to think about it. If you can make your price so much disconnected from the marketplace, not just not just a little bit more expensive, but significantly more expensive than the rest of the marketplace, then they have to pause. So, when I started Gymlutch, which was my first company, when I came into the marketplace, the most expensive competitor was priced at $5,000.
(12:59) And I thought to myself, well, I don't want to just be a little bit more expensive. I want to be way more expensive. And so, our product, the minimum thing that someone could buy from us was $16,000. And the next thing someone buy from us was $126,000. Right? It was so far outside of what everyone else was doing that they were like, "My god, like this has to be something different.
(13:20) it must be something different because it has to be because it's priced so differently. And so your price communicates so much about your business and the value you're going to provide that it's inextricably linked to the value that you're providing. All right? Which is why in one of our ways of fixing the value is actually looking at the price and making sure that we're charging what it's worth so that we can provide the results in a meaningful way to our prospects.
(13:39) Because obviously all that extra money that I was able to have compared to my competitors, they had $5,000 and had to make a margin from that. I had $16,000. I could reinvest $5,000 right off the top into making unbelievable experience. I could invest the entire cost of their program into making someone's experience better.
(13:54) And as a result, our clients got better results. Their perceived value is higher. We had more referrals, etc., etc. And that was the virtuous cycle in action. Okay? And so note, if you have something where a client must perform options or some action, excuse me, in order to be successful, then it would follow the more invested they are, the more invested they will be.
(14:12) All right? Which in turn will create better students and better outcomes. So ethically, if you want to say that you're helping someone the most you possibly can, then you have to ethically get them emotionally invested in the outcome. Especially if you're doing a do-it-yourself or done with you type of service where they have to do something, you have to increase their emotional investment in order for them to get the result.
(14:32) All right? And so increasing the quality of your prospects increases the quality of your product. Think about that for a second. You can literally increase the quality of your product because the level and the and the number of customers who are successful by increasing the quality of your prospects which you can do by raising your price which is a bar a barrier to entry for people to come in.
(14:51) And so that way you get only the best people. You have more money to invest in them and then they get they have a higher perceived value. They don't price compare you to anyone else because you're so far outside of their range and you can do things that no one else can do because you have more margin than everyone else has.
(15:02) And that's how you create a winning combo. All right. And so that includes how to charge what it's worth. And and so in the next video, which you can find at acquisition.com, this is in the offers training. I have all of these courses and modules for you there. They're absolutely free. My goal is for anyone who's below $3 million a year to just use my stuff and make the money.
(15:22) Like absolutely take it. Go make your $3 million plus. And hopefully, you know, once you cross three or five million, you know, give us a call and we'd love to help you get to to 30 plus and exit so you only have to get rich once. So keep being awesome. We'll see you on the flip side. What?

CLASS 4 The Value Equation - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f9x0b3bANsU

Transcript:
(00:00) Welcome. My name is Alexi. I'm the CEO of acquisition.com. If you're new to the channel, we help three to$10 million businesses scale and exit so they only have to get rich once. If you're below $3 million a year in revenue, then everything I have here is to get you to hopefully get to $3 million a year.
(00:14) And I do it absolutely free because I just want you to get more value than anything that you have to buy online and buy $1,000 courses and $10,000 coaching programs. I just want to give it all to you because honestly, I don't need your money. All right. We had uh four companies that we continue to still own at this day.
(00:28) We've scaled to $112 million. And so I I just I just want everyone to be rich. That's really what I want. All right. So, in the last two two trainings, I talked about picking the right market by finding a starving crowd, figuring out how to charge what it's worth. And in this video, this is one of my most impactful concepts that has changed my life.
(00:42) And it's understanding how to create value out of thin air. It's understanding the perception around value in your prospect's minds. All right. If you want to check out the other videos, you can go to acquisition.com. But let's dive in. All right. So, the value equation offer component number three. All right.
(00:58) So your offer might not be converting because what you are offering is not valuable enough. Simply put, it is not valuable enough. So we have to increase the value itself. And in order to increase the value, you have to understand what makes value, what creates value from a perception from from a perceptional standpoint.
(01:10) All right, what is the framework? So here's how you can increase value. All right, so there's four pieces and this is this equation. All right, so you can you can screenshot this, you can write this down. This equation changed my life. It took me a long time to kind of come up with this and and and rework it and rework it and rework it.
(01:23) And um I believe that this is the best distillation of of these ideas, which is you have to make sure like the better the dream outcome, the better the outcome of what we are selling someone, the more value the person is going to have and and attach to our service or product, the likelihood that they achieve that outcome with our service and product in and of itself increases value.
(01:43) And I'm going to I'm going to explain what that means in a second. Now, you have this big line. All right? So those are the things that increase value is the stuff on the top side of the equation and the stuff on the bottom side of the equation are the things that decrease value. All right, which is how long is it going to take them? What's the time delay between purchase and achieving the result? And then effort and sacrifice, which is how much are they going to have to do? How much are they going to have to suffer in order to get the result? And so if you think
(02:05) about this from a from a theoretical standpoint, if I could achieve this amazing dream outcome with 100% likelihood and it happened instantly and they didn't have to do anything, that would be the ultimate valuable thing, right? That is the idea. And so in in in theory, someone could just think of something because it's so easy to transact with my business and it literally appeared in front of them with no effort immediately and it was exactly the way we wanted.
(02:24) That would be supremely valuable. And that is the idea that we're chasing after. And I think all of us entrepreneurs should be chasing that hypothetical perfection. And if you think about that as your gold standard, then you always have a direction to be able to move your products and services in. All right. So let's break down each of these uh in more detail.
(02:41) So uh dream outcome is the end result meaningful to them. So a lot of times, you know, especially newer entrepreneurs, they always think they have to do something like crazy unique. And a lot of times you just need to be really good at the thing. You don't like none of the businesses I've had have been really unique.
(02:54) They've just been better at doing a core thing and solved a unique problem in a in a nuanced way, right? And so fundamentally, we have our person here. Hopefully you can see it in the video, little guy. And the end result is they have, you know, where they they're on top of this little mountain of achievement.
(03:08) and this little path, this travel is that as long as there there's a gap between there, then there's there's an outcome that they don't have that they would like to have, right? And so the reason that I bring this one up is that this is most important when understanding the price points between different industries or different problems being solved.
(03:22) So, for example, if I could make you a million dollars, right, then that would be more meaningful for many people than losing 20 pounds, right? It just is, right? And so because that might be more meaningful to you, you'd be willing to pay me more for that outcome. Which inherently means that if you want to make more money, figure out ways to solve more expensive problems, right? So point number one is making sure that the dream outcome for your prospects is meaningful to them.
(03:44) All right? The second is around risk. All right? So this is the perceived likelihood of achievement. Do they think they're actually going to succeed if they buy from you? Right? So let me give you an example around this. If I had two surgeons that you were thinking about getting a getting a procedure from, all right, and and for one guy, it was his first surgery out of medical school and the other guy was his 10,000th surgery, right? Which one would you be willing to pay more for? Well, probably the 10,000th guy, right? But here's what's
(04:09) ironic. It probably takes that guy less time than the the the the first hour surgeon, right? Uh but that's okay because we're willing to pay that because our perceived likelihood of him doing a good job is significantly higher. And the reason that's valuable to us is because it decreases our risk of a negative outcome.
(04:27) And so in a real way, the more success you create for for clients, the more future value you create. So me having if I had only built one multiple eight figureure business, then you know I I would have something to land on, right? But if I've built five, right, then you see that as a more repeatable outcome, right? It's more likely that what I'm doing is is is good, right? And statistically, just as a as a fun fact for you, it's one in it's point4%.
(04:53) So one in 250 and two one in every 250 businesses is is an eight figureure business. And so it would be a point4% chance to achieve it one time. If I've done it five times then the likelihood would be point4*4*4*4*4 uh which equals a very very very low number or there's a successful framework that we can repeat over and over again. All right and that's that's why um we we've been able to do that and so it's because this stuff works.
(05:15) All right so one is the outcome two is increasing the perceived likelihood. We do those two things and this is what I did for the majority of my career in the beginning is I spent a lot of my time trying to increase the the perceived outcome and the perceived likelihood of achievement. And the important point here is that we're increasing the perceived likelihood of achievement.
(05:30) Right? You could get 100% of your client's results, but if they don't know that, then they're not going to be able to perceive the value. So, it's making sure we also communicate the likelihood of their success. All right. Now, underneath of that line, we have the time delay. How long will it take them to see the final result and how long will it take them to see an initial result? So, those are two aspects of the time delay.
(05:48) So, if I were to work with you and say, "Hey, uh, I'll give a weight loss example is just simple and easy for everyone." If I said, "Hey, uh, work with me and tomorrow you'll have a six-pack." That would be significantly more valuable than you've got to wait a year to get a six-pack, right? And that's how that's how like one of the easiest ways to provide value and crush a marketplace that's already established is go in, find the the big thing that everyone else is doing, do it in half the time, right? That's how you can create value
(06:11) like that super easily. All right? And so you can always think about time as a component of value because people value their time more than anything. I mean, think about and as as a pro tip, fast beats free. So even if there's free players in your marketplace, you can beat free by simply being faster, right? People walk and instead they they take an Uber because it's faster, right? People used to have USPS for postal, but they'd prefer to do FedEx because when it always, you know, absolutely must be there overnight, right? And the point
(06:37) and that was that that was their value proposition was speed was FedEx. Their whole value proposition was speed. All right? All right. And so they had a player that was significantly cheaper than them, but they were able to get there based on time delay. How long is it going to take them to see their final result? All right.
(06:48) And if you have something that's going to be a long time for them to see result, then is there a way that we can trigger them progress and show them progress on the way there so that we can increase the perceived value of the thing that we are selling? All right. And then finally, the fourth component of this is uh effort and sacrifice.
(07:03) So what are the additional costs and inconveniences they must incur to achieve this result? What's the sweat they have to put into this? Do they have to put this box uphill? Right? Of course not or hopefully not right and so the idea is if we can increase this top side and decrease this bottom side then we are going to create a tremendous amount of value for our prospects.
(07:19) All right and so the idea here is increase the desire and promise decrease the time and effort and sacrifice and that is how you create ultimate value. Okay. And so this is how I like to think about this uh in in a real world example, right? I said money versus fitness for most people making money is going to be a higher perceived outcome.
(07:37) All right? So that's going to be more valuable. All right? If I were um if I were like talking about Cool Sculpting, all right, as an example here, versus, you know, lifting weights, this is something that people are paying more for than they pay for a a Beach Body online workout membership, right? Why are they willing to do that when the outcome is the same, right? Why are they willing to do that? It's because of the other aspects of this equation.
(07:59) If someone says cool sculpting, the likelihood that they think they're going to achieve a flatter stomach is very high because they just think they're going to pay, the machine's going to happen, and and they're going to they're going to pee out the extra fat and they're good. The time delay on this is super is super look no surgery, no downtime.
(08:15) They even say the value in the actual advertisement itself and the effort and sacrifice is nothing. They don't have to change how they eat. They don't have to start working out. They don't have to be sore. They don't have to show up wake up at 5:00 in the morning. They don't have to change the way they cook. They don't have to do any of that stuff, right? And so, as a result, people pay, you know, $2,500, $5,000 for stuff like this.
(08:28) And they won't pay more than 10 bucks, 20 bucks a month for something like that, even though the outcome is the same. That is how you can deconstruct and recreate value. All right? And so if we're looking at this, I I just went through all four of those variables, so I'll skip through it. If you're looking at this, it's wake up skinny, right? That's the value proposition.
(08:44) Or eat less, be sore, discomfort, etc. Right? Obviously, that's not going to be as valuable, which is why the top side is more. Now, for me, as a hypothetical thing for everyone here, a theoretical, this is one of the concepts that I like to to talk about, which is getting the bottom to zero.
(08:58) And so, as I as I've developed as an entrepreneur, I used to focus a lot on increasing the desire and perceived likelihood. So, it's lots of testimonials, lots of dream outcomes. Um, but as I've developed and I look at bigger businesses and and enterprises, I really have have spotted the fact that they focus most of their time on getting the bottom to zero, right? Think about Amazon for example.
(09:19) Um, they they've consistently invested in getting things done faster, right? They've consistently invested in decreasing effort and sacrifice, right? The the the sacrifice is going to be the risk that you buy something that's bad. So, they put the reviews on there. The effort is going to be around, you know, you just click with one button. There's no inconvenience.
(09:33) You don't have to type all this stuff and you click with one button and then it's literally at your doorstep in the next day and maybe by the time you watch this in two hours or one hour, right? As they've been able to move closer and closer to that dream outcome and the reason so that to that outcome and the idea is that they focus ruthlessly on getting the bottom to zero and that is where you can create in theory infinite value.
(09:52) All right? And so look at these things you know Netflix for example, it's immediate. you can just start watching all of your favorite shows without having to pick because they'll recommend the shows that they think you're going to like more and you can do it immediately versus a blockbuster competitor to get in your car, go there, peruse.
(10:07) You might not know what the rating is or if you're going to like it based on your tastes, right? They literally provide so much more value. They decrease the risk of of wasting time watching something you don't like and they make it immediately available to you. And that is why these companies are so valuable, right? And so when I think about building an enterprise of true value, I think so much more now about the effort and sacrifice.
(10:23) How can I make this more convenient? How can I make this more seamless? How can I have this happen more immediately for the prospect or customer to provide value in a way that no one else is? Right? And so that is the value equation. Those are the four variables. The goal is to get the bottom to zero.
(10:36) It's all about perception for the prospect. Not just doing it, but making sure they perceive that they're going to have less time delay. They're going to perceive that they're going to be very likely to achieve it. They're going to perceive that there's not a lot of inconvenience for them. So, as long as we can communicate those things, then the end result of the product that we have is more valuable.
(10:52) And so when you think about your product right now, I want you to think about each of these four variables. I want you to think about the dream outcome, perceived likelihood, time, delay, and effort and sacrifice. And think about how you can recombine those things uh to create a more valuable product. All right. And so with that, we we covered starving crowd.
(11:06) We covered charging what it's worth, which you can find both of those videos at acquisition.com under the offers training. It's absolutely free. It's advanced training. I have many more trainings there. We finished the value equation. In the next video, we're going to talk about actually creating the offer that you're going to present to the marketplace.
(11:19) So, these were these were concepts that we had to understand first before we could actually put and assemble the pieces together, which is what we're going to do in the next video. All right. Uh, super excited. Hope you're hope you're digging this with me. Uh, check out more.com and I'll see you in the next vid. Bye.

CLASS 5 Offer Creation Pt 1 - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RXHbgcU2Tdc

Transcript:
(00:00) What's going on everyone? Alex Shamosi, CEO and founder of acquisition.com. I'm here to talk to you about how to make more money with your offers. We own a portfolio of companies. We help three to 10 million minimum companies get to $30 million plus and scale and exit in 3 to 5 years.
(00:15) And for everyone who's below that level, I'm just giving you all this stuff for free with the hopes genuinely that you use the stuff and and grow to the point where I could maybe help you get rich once so that you never have to get rich again. We're definitely the make make your last dollar people, not make your first dollar people.
(00:28) And so, uh, this is just my free gift to you because I just want everyone to be wealthy. So, let's rock and roll. So, creating the grand slam offer. All right. So, there once you, uh, once you know that you're in the right market, you're charging, you you've broken your beliefs around pricing, you understand how to how to deconstruct and recreate value.
(00:42) Now, it's time to actually put those pieces together and figure out the outcomes that our clients are going to have, the problems, and and how we're going to solve them. All right, so let's dive in. So, offer component number four is building your offer part one. All right, so the offer might not be converting because what you're offering is not solving their actual problems.
(00:55) All right. So, this is one of the key points where people will market that they're solving a problem, but they're not actually solving the problem with the way that they're providing their fulfillment, their their delivery. All right. And so, this is this is the process that I break down when I'm working with uh you know, one of our one of our portfolio companies is identify the dream outcome that their prospects want.
(01:12) All right? Then, we list out all the perceived problems. This is important. It's not just their problems. It's their perceived problems that are going to come up. And then, we're going to turn all those problems into solution sets that we're going to solve, every single one of them, which basically it eliminates all ways of failure for for a client.
(01:27) And then part two is going to be packaging that into a delivery system. All right, so let's rock in number one. All right, identify dream outcome. So remember this little this little graphic I had before about the dream outcome. So the idea here is that here's the time period between where they are and where they are where they want to be.
(01:41) We want to make this as easy as possible for this gap. We want this the outcome to be as specific as humanly possible, which is this this lovely uh purple arrow up here. And the the sentence that you have to think about is you know xx specific outcome in y time period without biggest pain or fear right and so this is how we're really deconstructing the value.
(01:59) So we have to think this is the value that they want. They want to lose 20 pounds in six weeks without any risk, right? Or without having to give up the things that they love, right? So, this is very specific for this. Now, we you might also even add the avatar, which you've seen in some of my other stuff, like I help, you know, you know, moms with over three kids, you know, lose weight within 6 months without having to go to the gym or or change what their family's eating. Ah, okay.
(02:23) Well, that's going to be really, you know, without without extra trips to the grocery store, right? Or whatever their biggest pain is. And this is why sometimes it's useful to be the prospect. So, one of the the best things that a lot of entrepreneurs do, an easy recipe for success is solving problems that you've already solved for yourself, which is a classic entrepreneurial journey is usually we suffer with something.
(02:39) We're plagued by it. We have the desire to solve our own problem. We solve it. And then we see other people just like us who are struggling the same way, who are down here at the bottom of our of the of the pyramid and they want to be at the top and we say, "Hey, I can help you do it because I've already done it.
(02:50) " Right? And if you think about like for me, my entrepreneurial career was first I uh you know, I I wanted to get in shape. I got in shape. From there, people started asking me how I got in shape. So literally people started paying me to help them. And it was weird cuz I didn't I wasn't even trying to to make a business out of it.
(03:04) And then from there I started a business, you know, helping people get in shape. And then from there all the people who were helping people get in shape, right? Other trainers, you know, gym owners were like, "Hey man, how are you building such a a good business here?" Because in the beginning, I wasn't making money, right? And so then I had to figure out how to make money doing that one thing.
(03:17) And so then I was like, "Okay, well now I just figured out my problem of making my gyms." I had six of them. And so I helped started helping other gyms. And then from there, the next level was there was all these businesses that had licensing products and and education and niche consulting businesses. So they came to me and they're like, "Hey, how did you build, you know, gym launch to be as big as it was, right?" And so then we started helping those guys out.
(03:35) And so it's it's it's this continuously iterative process of you solve a problem and do so so well that other people notice it. And then what happens eventually is that people will always ask you for help. And so that is the easiest entrepreneurial journey. Obviously, you can always just identify markets and go after them.
(03:49) Um, but I think if you're especially if you're starting out, um, then that is one of the easiest recipes for success. All right, so identify the dream outcome is number one. So we have to know what we're actually solving. That's obvious, right? We have to clarify what is the thing we're actually going to solve. And right now, if you don't even know what that is, then you need to write this out because if you can't clearly articulate it, then then I can help anyone.
(04:07) So like for me with acquisition.com, me identifying the problem is I'm helping three to$10 million at minimum companies get to $30 million plus an exit in three to five years, right? And so, and they can do that without messing up, right? That's that's the dream outcome that I'm helping a very specific avatar achieve a very specific result in a in in a time period, three to five years, right? Um and and and to decrease their perceived likelihood of of risk, it's like, well, I've already done this, you know, four or five times, so we're we're really,
(04:32) you know, pretty good at it. All right? And so that is the idea. All right? So, second is list out all the perceived problems. All right? So, what are the things that are preventing them from getting to where they want to go? Right? You have to think about this. What are all the things that you struggled with on your process in your in your journey? Right? And so I like to think about this in a couple ways.
(04:51) So one is what is every single intricate step they're going to have to do or take in order to see success with your product, right? And so if I'm using weight loss as an example because it's a simple one and everyone understands it. Obviously I like one fifth of my of my portfolio is is even fitness related. I just like it because everyone gets it.
(05:09) Which is one is like what is what they have to They have to go grocery shopping and then they have to pack and unpack the food and then they're going to have to cook the food and then once they cook the food they're going to have to prep it up and divide it into little boxes. Then after that they're going to have to eat the food, right? And then from there they're going to have to clean their dishes from cooking and from eating the food and then they also have to feed their family and then they're also going to eat out. And so there's all these
(05:27) problems that get in the way and these intricate steps step by step by step that someone has to do in order to be successful when they change the way they eat, right? And so each of these issues has flavors of problems. All right? So if you think about this like each one of those is one problem all right and so each problem has multiple components to it right which is what which for us as entrepreneurs is beautiful because it gives us endless opportunity to solve problems because that's fundamentally what we do we solve problems that's what
(05:51) entrepreneurs are is problem solvers all right and so if you took the value equation that I talked about before right and you reverse that right when they say grocery shopping is my problem they're thinking multiple things are the problem and this is where understanding nuances of language and thought patterns is important Right? One, they're going to say, "It's not worth it.
(06:11) " All right? It's not worth me going and doing grocery shopping stuff, and that's that is a function of dream outcome. This is not going to be financially worth it for me. The outcome is not worth it. Right? The second would be around likelihood of achievement. They're going to say things like, "It won't work for me specifically.
(06:24) I won't be able to stick with it. It's too far. There's too many stores. These are all excuses for likelihood of achievement." All right? So, our goal is how can we reverse each of these things? How can we say, "I do. It is going to work for you specifically. I you will be able to stick with it because of these things that we've done to take into account of that external factors will get in my way which is one of the most spec uh one of the most uh unique and service specific problems uh that will be specific to your service like if you're selling
(06:47) beauty stuff or you're selling you know uh how to build build a business model how to market or whatever it is. Understanding the external factors that get in the way is going to be the most unique part of this but the remainder of these are actually fairly common across all services.
(06:59) All right, so the third thing, let's say we're remember we're just talking about grocery shopping here is they're going to say, you know what, it's gonna be too hard. It's gonna be too confusing. It won't be enjoyable and I'm gonna be bad at it. All right, so think about all these appraisals. These are the thoughts that your prospects are thinking right now.
(07:11) All right, and so that is a function of effort and sacrifice, right? They're thinking this is going to be a lot of effort and sacrifice. And so what we're trying to do is for each of these, how can I make it easy, right? How can I make it simple to understand? How can I make it fun? How can I gify this? And how can I make them feel like they're actually good at it? Right? These are all things that we can change in their perceptions based on how we communicate to them.
(07:31) All right? And then four is a function of time, right? It's going to take too long for me to do this. It won't be convenient for me. The outcome will take too long. All right? Which is a key point here. All right? So each of these one problems because I listed a huge amount of problems on the first page. I said grocery list.
(07:47) I said, sorry, grocery shopping. I said meal prep. I said eating out. There's all these problems. But for each of them, they're going to think about the four factors of value. And so the beautiful part about this is that this gives you gives us as entrepreneurs so many opportunities to solve problems that provide value, which is the point.
(08:04) So compare compare what we're talking about right now and all of these different things. Hopefully your mind should be racing with with ways that you're currently not solving problems that you can. And by doing this, you'll be able to position yourself in a way that no one else is positioned in the marketplace, right? Because you're going to solve all these problems that no one else even talks about.
(08:19) And by doing so, you will show that you understand your prospect's problems better than anyone else. they will feel understood and as a result increase their conviction the likely that they think that you will be able to solve their problem that's the idea all right so each of these um each of these can have you know five plus problems or external factors all right and so I said earlier grocery shopping cooking meal prepping eating cleaning food dishes feeding the family eating out all of them are going to come down to those four those those those value equation of
(08:46) it's going to be hard it's be timeconuming it's going to take too long it won't work for me it's not going to be sustainable etc right we want to solve each of those problems for each of those external factors and things that are going to get in the way of their success. All right? And so that is why first we figure out what they want.
(08:59) Then we figure out all the things that are going to block them. All right? That's listing out all the perceived problems. All right? And then we're going to turn all those problems into solutions. That's the third step here. Okay? And so I'm using the same example just to keep things simple for everyone.
(09:10) All right? So let's say the problem was buying healthy food and grocery shopping, right? And so I said it before, it's hard. It's confusing. I won't like it. I'll suck at it. So what we do is we create a system that will say how to make buying healthy food easy, enjoyable so that anyone can do it, especially busy moms, right? So all we do is reverse the things that people most likely struggle with and then we actually solve that problem.
(09:29) This is this is just a word of copy on how to set how how to communicate the problem solving. In the next video I'm going to show you actually how we're going to actually package and deliver this. But this is the communication behind it. All right. So if you say it takes too much time, how to buy healthy food quickly.
(09:40) All right, this is simple. I'm not trying to we're not trying to be sexy here. This is just simple ways of taking problems and turning into solutions. It's expensive. how to buy healthy food for less than you can your your current grocery bill. Well, now whatever your current grocery bill is, I'm going to show you how to to lose weight and actually spend less than you currently are.
(09:56) Huh, that is valuable, right? U it's unsustainable. How to make buying healthy food take less effort than buying unhealthy food. Oh, well then that will be sustainable because if it takes you less effort than your current thing does, then you're going to always do the thing that takes less effort to stick with, right? We always go to the the the path of least resistance as humans, right? Because we we only have a certain amount of decision making power, only a certain amount of energy.
(10:11) And so if I can make my solution less effort than buying the current things they are, then they're going to be likely to stick with in the long run. And that's something we're going to communicate in our marketing and our sales copy, right? It's not a priority for me. My family's needs are going to get in my way.
(10:22) You know, my kids, they don't want to eat this kind of food. Well, how to buy healthy food for you and your family at the same time, right? So you can go to the same store, right? So this again, we're only solving the problem around grocery shopping. We would do this list for each of the problems.
(10:35) Now, we'll be able this is chunking down, right? This is this is breaking apart. And then we're going to rebundle these things back together in distilled bullets. But this is this is the process that I go through when I'm thinking about how to solve problems. All right. And then finally, you know, it's undoable. If I travel, I won't I won't I won't know what to get if I'm eating out.
(10:50) And then simply put, it's like how to buy healthy food when we're traveling. All right? Like I'm not trying to be crazy here. It's just understanding literally if you say this to somebody and you just said the the back side of the equation. The thing is is each of them has a handful of these in their mind of reasons.
(11:04) You don't know which one it is. And that's why we have to solve all of them in order to increase the maximum likelihood of conversions for the for the offer and also solve all their problems. Right? And so that is how we turn all the problems into solution sets. So big picture the first half of creating the offer is understanding what they want the dream outcome listing out all the things that are their perceived problems that are blocking them which for me I like to think of that as every single intricate step of what they actually
(11:26) have to do in order to be successful. Another hack around that is simply thinking what is the next need right is the need before and what is the need after? what is my client journey before and after they work with me and they're trying to solve those problems too. And so the idea here is that we can just lubricate their path from where they are to where they want to go so that they have no obstacles whatsoever that we have not already accounted for.
(11:45) By doing that we can ensure success and by extension make sure that they love us and send all their friends. All right. And so then uh step three is we turn all the problems into solutions and that is exactly what we did. All right. So that is part one of creating the grand slam offers outcome problems and solutions.
(11:59) In the next video, what I'm going to do is I'm going to talk about grand offers, which is sales to fulfillment, how to do it, the cheat codes, and how to actually stack these things into the thing that actually going to sell them. All right, so if you like this stuff, go to acquisition.com.
(12:09) This is free training, the whole course there. This is under the offers course. There are many other courses that I will be releasing over time, but this is the one that literally initiates transaction with the customer, which is why I think it's most important, which is why the one I started with this first. All right. So, I'll see you in the next video and we'll rack and stack and make an amazing offer for your prospects.

CLASS 6 Offer Creation Pt 2 - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4T1uAaUX4RU

Transcript:
(00:00) Welcome everyone. My name is Alex Ramoszium, CEO of acquisition.com. We own a portfolio of companies help founders who are at three to$10 million minimum in revenue get to $30 million plus scale and exit in 3 to 5 years. That is what we do. For everyone who's not in that category, my goal is to just help you for free and provide more value than anything you can buy online.
(00:19) And my transparent goal is to make everyone wealthy because that's what I I believe that. And hopefully, you know, if you went from zero to 3 million or 1 million to 3 million using the stuff that we provide for free, then I already know that you'll be able to execute and then I will be able to help you far more and show you how deep the rabbit hole goes.
(00:32) So, anyways, that is why I'm doing this stuff for free if you're curious. And so, let's dive in uh and talk about how to provide highv value products. So, it's taking your existing services and making them more valuable by changing the offer that we're providing them from a fulfillment standpoint.
(00:47) So, we already talked about, you know, making sure we're picking the right market, charging what it's worth, how to how to deconstruct value, how to understand all of the obstacles are going to get in the way of the prospect so that we can create a highv value solution. Now, we're getting into how to actually do this in the real world. Okay.
(01:00) So, what are we actually going to give them? What are we literally going to give them in exchange for their money? All right. So, this is off building your offer part two. All right. So, the offer might not be actually making money because what you're providing is not high margin or valuable. All right.
(01:10) This is a key point. It might not be high margin. So, you might be maybe solving the problem, but you're not making any money. All right. So this is I'm going to show you how to break this apart and make it work for you. All right. So there's a few few pieces to this. One is understanding from a theoretical standpoint the sales to fulfillment continuum that exists.
(01:24) The next is the delivery vehicles. This is the how of how you're going to deliver the the solution to them. And then what I like to do is is a process called trimming and stacking for max profit and value. All right. So we're going to look at all the solutions we could possibly do and then we're going to trim the ones that we don't think are going to be valuable and we're going to stack the ones that we do think are going to be valuable and high margin and that is what we're going to ultimately provide. All right. Okay, so let's start
(01:44) with the sales of fulfillment continuum. So right now you've got this this fun little graphic that I drew here of easy to sell and hard to fulfill, right? So if something's easy to sell, it tends to be hard to fulfill. If something's hard to sell, it tends to be easy to fulfill, right? And so I'll give you an example of that.
(02:02) So if I said, you know, I'm doing done for you services, like done for you in general tends to be easy to sell, harder to fulfill because now you have to do everything, right? On the flip side, if I said, hey, I'm going to sell you a course. that in general tends to be harder to sell, especially at higher prices.
(02:14) You have to be far better at persuasion and provide, you know, stacking value and communicating and marketing, all that kind of stuff. So, it's harder to sell, but it's easy to fulfill. You just give someone a login, right? And so, this is understanding this continuum is really key, especially as you're getting started.
(02:26) Now, for me, I tend to focus far more um on this side of the equation when I'm when I'm working with a business, as in it's something easy to sell, hard to fulfill, and then we slowly work our way this way uh to the other side. Now, sometimes you can build an entire business just around this and especially if you're a very good operator and you're good at building infrastructure, building teams, building culture, and you've figured out a new way to do fulfillment so that something's easy to sell and easy to fulfill. And that's really we want to
(02:48) get to. But in general, this is typically how services work. And you can see this on the continuum of done for you services as in like people pay you money and you do something for them. Done with you is more like, you know, like a trainer, a personal trainer, for example, is a done with you. You know, if you went to the gym or, you know, if you had a coach who's got a program and you're following steps.
(03:06) Mentorship is a common example of done with you an adviser, right? And then do it yourself is you get access to a book, you get access to a course just like you're doing right now. And this is something that is harder to sell and easy to fulfill, right? So that is uh kind of how that continuum works. So the way that I like to think about this though for me personally is I like to focus on the things that are hard to fulfill first that are easy to sell.
(03:28) And I I like to liken this to the the Tesla pyramid. Okay? So, if you think about this, you know, I love Tesla's entire process around this is that they first started with $250,000 cars, the Tesla Roadster, right? And they price positioned themselves as doing this thing, right? And it was harder for them to make those cars.
(03:46) It was a very small smaller audience uh that wanted them, but those people all had lots of money and would happily do it because they were, you know, they were they were they were uh first adopters, right? Now, over time from there, they moved down the pyramid and started selling $100,000 cars. Now, that was accessible to far more people.
(04:01) and and then at the bottom you've got $30,000 cars which is accessible to to just about everybody right in the US at least. And so for me, if I'm working with a business, especially if you're starting out right now, you're under three million, looking at this and thinking, okay, I'm okay serving fewer people at higher prices so that I can get my chops, learn the skills, price anchor myself in a way so that when you do say, hey, I'm opening up this thing that's a little bit easier for me to fulfill.
(04:25) You'll have the credibility, the perceived likelihood of achievement from your prospects. So they're like, well, this person was charging this much, so now this is a deal, right? And it all exists within the context that we create. This is the frame of mind. This is the frame of reference. And so I prefer to build business bu build businesses from the top down rather than the bottom up.
(04:40) I see this as a very common mistake. This is my opinion um of of guys starting out is they try and I I I can't even tell you the amount of times they're like, "Well, I don't want to sell something that's not scalable." And I'm like, "Bro, you don't even have clients. You don't even worry about scale.
(04:52) You don't even have money. So, let's go get you money. Let's go sell high ticket, more custom stuff first. Let's get cash flow. Let's get easier things to sell, harder to fulfill. Let's get things going. and then learn more about the business and figure out what pieces we can trim and stack that we can provide pretty like almost the same amount of value for for for less operational drag, something that's easier to fulfill for us and lower the price, but we've been positioned in such a way that that makes it easier to sell. And so the idea is
(05:17) that when you come down this pyramid, it would normally be harder to sell some of these things, but because we have gone through this process, it is easier to sell and actually makes the process uh more fluid. Okay? And so I I I just said this is a consolidated point. Selling the more expensive thing, automatically price anchors and value anchors for your lesser expensive thing with more scale.
(05:34) It also creates a simple reason why for your communication. So it's like we couldn't keep up with all the demand for our custom 101 thing. And so we made something that we could, you know, that that more people could participate in. So if you're looking at what I'm doing and the reason that acquisition.
(05:46) com is built as a pyramid as well is for that same concept is that I'm really just serving, you know, the guys who are at 3 to 10 million and trying to scale and exit. I have made the rest of my entire pyramid. I don't really want to sell courses. I don't want to sell, you know, coaching programs.
(05:58) I just want everyone to make money. And so my goal here is I'm just making everything easy to fulfill. For me, obviously besides the front-end work of of putting all this stuff together for you is that just so that you you can be successful. And obviously, if you make money, you know, using this stuff, right, then when I could work with you specifically, then you already know that my style and my frameworks are effective and it makes the the process much easier. All right.
(06:17) So the conclusion is and this is one of the sayings that I have and I will repeat it here is that you need to create flow first then you monetize flow and then you add friction which is making it harder to sell and easier to fulfill. So the friction in the process is I need to make this scalable which is how do I make it how do I make it easier for me to fulfill.
(06:34) Now in general most times when you do things that are easier for you it's less value to the prospect. Not always, but in general. And that that's why it takes a lot of time and thinking to create things that are very high value and easy to fulfill, right? And so my rule of thumb when someone is starting out is create flow first, get the yeses first, even if it's hard to fulfill, make money, and then when you look at all the things you did, I'll bet you there are some things in that process that you said you were going to fulfill on that the person didn't
(06:57) actually get a lot of value from, and they may have been really hard for you to fulfill. So you can start cutting those pieces out, adding things that you didn't have, and then you you're basically iterating on your offer until you finally have the stack of things that are very valuable that you can provide to them.
(07:10) Okay? And so we always start here and then move that way. Okay? That's kind of my my thought process, especially if you're starting out. So one of the other things I like about this is that because when you have harder to fulfill things, they tend to be more expensive and so you don't need to sell as many of them. So it makes makes it easier for you to get started without needing to, you know, to accommodate scale, which is an whole problem in of itself.
(07:28) All right? So get some money, then use the money to build your business. Don't solve for problems that don't exist yet, which is I need to I need to be scalable. It's like you don't need to be scalable because you don't even have clients yet. All right. So number one, sales to fulfillment continuing.
(07:38) Understanding that that is one of the the first things in terms of where we're going to start on this pyramid because when we're about to get into the house, that is the context under which we're going to be thinking through the house. Okay. So there's two pieces to the delivery vehicle. So it's listing a problem and all the ways you can solve that problem, right? Then we have use the cheat codes to make it easier to think through, which is basically the delivery cube.
(07:56) This is how I think through things. Okay, so I'm using the same example we had earlier. So we had buying healthy food is hard, confused and expensive, timeconuming, and I won't like it. Right? So if I wanted to provide a one-on-one solution, what would I offer? I might offer, hey, I'm going to take you uh to the grocery store myself and we're going to go shopping together this first time so that you understand where to look, how to do it, and how we can do it in in a quick and inconvenient way.
(08:18) So that would be a really easy way for them to think, well, I mean, if I went with him, it wouldn't be confusing. It wouldn't be hard. He would show me how to do it for less. he would show me how to do it faster. And if I was with him and they liked me during the sales process, they probably would say I would kind of enjoy it. I like the company.
(08:32) Right? So in one fell swoop, if I solve all those problems oneonone, right? Now, these are other ways I would maybe solve that same problem oneonone. So I have inerson grocery shopping where I take the clients and teach them how to shop. Now I could do this one to many. But if I just wanted one, I could do that.
(08:45) I could do a personalized grocery list. So I might teach them how to make the list. That'd be oneonone a single consultation that I would show them how to make their specific list, right? I could do a full service shopping where I buy their food for them. All right, this is a done for you solution that's one-on-one, right? I'm just going to buy their food for them and deliver to them.
(09:00) Another one would be in personal orientation. So, this is now in person but just not at the store where I teach them what to get. Right? I could have text support while shopping. So, I could say, "Hey, just shoot me a text when you're shopping and if you have anything, if you get stuck, let me know. Just shoot me a picture of the can of soup that you're thinking about buying and I'll make sure that it's according to your plan.
(09:18) " It could be a phone call while grocery shopping, which is we'll plan it out and I'll get on the phone with you for for 30 minutes while you're shopping to make sure that you buy everything the right way. And it could be a FaceTime call, whatever. Right? And this way I'd provide, you know, direction and support throughout that process.
(09:31) All right? Now, if I wanted to provide the same concept in small group, all right, remember we're just solving this is just examples of solving one problem, which is they don't like grocery shopping. They don't know how to do it. All right. So, if I was doing a small group solution, I would do all I take a bunch of people shopping, right? I could do also a personalized grocery list for a group of people.
(09:45) I could kind of walk them through a framework or a process of creating their own list. I could buy their food for them again, but I would do this for everyone uh in a group fashion, not just one-on-one or I could do a a inerson orientation, not at the store. Right? So there's that's how I might be doing for a small group.
(09:59) Right? Now, if I wanted to a one to many solution, right? I might do a live grocery store tour that would be virtual or I might live stream into a group for all my new customers and let them ask questions live. I would go grocery shopping, not them, right? I could do a I could do one of them and do a recorded grocery store tour where I might shop once, record it, and then give them that as a reference point going forward, right? Um, I might do I might create a do-it-yourself grocery calculator where I create a sharable tool that shows them
(10:23) how to just put in their their meal plan and then they get their groceries spit out based on their goal and their calorie intake. I could create predetermined lists where each customer, you know, I might do this ahead of time, right? Where I have 30 different lists based on their body weight and goals and I say, "Ah, well, you're a you're a 1B.
(10:36) Here you go." And then I give them the 1B plan. I could have a grocery store buddy system where remember this is one to many. I could do this infinitely scalable. I would just pair customers, right? And then they still get a lot of the emotional benefits. I could I could pair old customers with new customers.
(10:50) I could pair two sets of new customers. I could also set up times where they all meet at the store without me and they go. I could also do pre-made Instacart grocery carts for delivery where I actually pre-make it. I share the cart with them and they click it on their phone. It's immediately delivered to them.
(11:04) All right? So these are different ways of solving the same problem, right? one to one small group one to many right and so this is the delivery cube this is how I think through any type of of product or service that I'm going to think of so if right now like I like to think of this as a creative process so when I've taught this before in the past um I've had different feedback one of them is don't even worry about this just think about everything you could possibly do for someone all right I tend to like having prompts so I do it this way if this is confusing where you can
(11:33) stop and just do it on your own the way I just said which is just list out every possible way you could massively think of. All right, we're going to trim and stack in a second. You're not going to do all of them, but you can think through just going how how many ways can I solve this problem.
(11:45) This is how I do it, though. So, the first dynamic that I just walked you through is one-on-one, small group, and one to many. All right, I like to think about it in that fashion. All right, the next way I like to think about it from a framework standpoint is how could I solve this problem in a do-it-yourself format? How could I solve this problem in a done with you format? How could I solve this problem in a done for you format? Now, you probably noticed that some of the solutions I had were do-it-yourself, done with you, and done for you. at each
(12:06) of these varying levels. So these are this is this is a cube, right? They all the all these components interact with each other, but I can't show a cube on the screen. So it's six boxes. All right. The next is the level of support. Do they have tech support? Do they have chat support? Do they have email support? Do they have a live phone call support? Do they have expert support? Do they have Zoom support? These are all different things that I can do at varying levels based on the convenience for me and the customer and the value
(12:27) it's going to provide. The next is what level of consumption am I going to have? Am I going to do am I going to have this have them consume uh this information via video? Is it going to be audio so they can just listen to it in the car? Is it going to be a written format or is it going to be live or is it going to be recorded? Right? These are all dynamics of how I'm going to have them consume.
(12:42) So if you're thinking through that, you're like, well, could I do what could I do live? What could I do recorded? What could I do via video? Could I do via PDF? Right? Those are all different ways of consuming the information. The next is speed and convenience, right? Am I going to provide this level of service at all hours, seven days a week? Am I going to do this uh, you know, 9 to5 Monday through Friday? That's the when.
(13:01) And then there's the the speed component, which is how quickly am I going to get back to somebody? Am I going to get back to them in in five minutes? Am I going to get back to them in in an hour? I'll tell you, uh, at one point for gym launch, we had a three-minute promise, which was uh, if someone had a question, our chat team was available, I think it was 12 hours a day, I think it was 99, that they would respond within 3 minutes or less.
(13:20) Now what we found out was that after doing this you know research right it was more valuable for our clients to have an expert that was less less available than I mean ideally an expert would be available 12 hours a day and maybe I should solve for that that's you know food for thought for me we actually ended up transitioning to a more valuable very very highlevel person being available every day but just not all day and so that was that was the solution that we ended up having but it's understanding these variables
(13:46) because that's just my market may be different for yours All right. And then finally, the last dynamic that I like to think through with this is the 10x to one10enth test. All right? And so I'll walk you through that. So right now, I want you to think about the price point that you're planning on charging for this for whatever your thing is, your services, your product, whatever.
(14:03) And that's X, right? That's what you're currently at. Now, if I said, right now, we're going to 10x your price. What else would you want to fulfill to make it 10 times more valuable? All right. So 10x the price in your mind and think what else would I normally give or provide in order to justify that price, right? And so that will get you thinking in a different dynamic of how you can provide and and solve problems because maybe you should 10x your price and provide those things because there are many people who
(14:28) just would prefer just more value, right? On the flip side, and this is a slightly different test, which is the onetenth test, which is if I had to I was forced to provide more value than I currently am, but I could only charge a tenth of what I'm currently charging, what would I do? And so what this does is it gets you thinking in building assets, building tools, building resources, and things that you would only have to build one time exclusively that are far more valuable than what you're currently doing. So
(14:56) think about like if I divide more value than I currently am and I had to charge onetenth the price. How would I structure that delivery? And so if you go through the 10x to one/10enth test, 10x will get you will stretch you up up up ways and then the onetenth test will stretch you from an efficiency standpoint.
(15:12) So you get both aspects of your mind stretched. All right? And so this is the delivery cube. This is what I like to think through when I'm creating products and solutions, which is really what we're doing. Uh services to fulfill on promises. Okay? And so now what I do is I list out all the possible solutions to all possible problems.
(15:28) All right? And then I and then just consider using the delivery cube if that's useful for you. If if that if that seems sounds like too much to you, then just list out all the ideas that you have. All right? And so that is the how. And the final step in this process is the trimming and stacking for maximum profit and value.
(15:42) Okay? So we now should have this huge list of stuff, right, of delivery systems that we're going to provide. And we're going to rate them in terms of value and cost to you. Okay? And so the way I think about this is maximizing profit and value. So there are going to be some solutions that if you had to rate based on the value equation which you I already shared with you earlier is that this might be low value high cost.
(16:00) Okay well we're not going to do that right and this one might be medium value low cost but even if it's not high even if it's not high cost it's low cost but it's not a lot of value then it just becomes a distraction right it's not something that like I want every single piece of my delivery to be hard-hitting.
(16:15) I want them to be like wow wow wow that's wonderful. I'm delighted. I'm delighted. I'm going to tell my friends. Like, that's what I want to think through when I'm creating my stack of solutions, right? And so, I only pick things that are high value. And now, once I have the high value things, you're going to see things that are high value and high cost and high value and low cost.
(16:34) I'm going to keep both of them for now. So, we're going to keep everything that is basically high value independent of cost. But we're going to note the cost uh for one final thing in a second. Okay? So you list them all out, cut out anything that's low value, note the cost, and you go to step five, which is figuring out the final uh value stack, right? And so the idea here is every single thing we have is going to solve all the problems that they have because they're going to be some solutions that solve multiple problems, right? So like I said earlier, if I was
(16:59) if I were doing a a live grocery tour, right, with a group of people, well, that's automatically going to solve the hard. It's confusing all of these other things. and I might only have one left which is it's not sustainable unless I did it every week in which case that's fine right but the point is is that it might not be sustainable for them in the long term so then I create you know a mini thing on the back end to show how how they can do it on their own in their own time etc right and so the idea is you have this matrix of problems in the
(17:22) in in the prospect's mind and we're just checking off every single one of the boxes so they have no reason to a not buy and b not be successful all right and so the final result here is highv value items and some that are high cost and some are low cost so the last step that I look at is I typically will not have more than one to two highcost delivery items for a set of solutions.
(17:42) So, I'll try and solve as many of the solutions as I can in low to to so low low to medium cost scenarios and save the one to two highcost things to be the heaviest hitting, right? And so, would I do I think that a live tour would be really valuable? Yes. Could I solve it in another way that would provide almost the same value? So, maybe I would do that buddy system thing that probably solves the same problem and it does, but I don't have to I'm not involved in it.
(18:06) I just have to pair the people. That's easier for me. if I provided a, you know, two one-on-one consultations during that period of time to help them troubleshoot, that would probably be perceived as valuable, increase the likelihood of success, and it's also a little bit more convenient for me, right? And so, those would be the types of things that I would be including.
(18:20) If I had a one-on-one coach, right, that I would assign to them, for example, to hold them accountable, whether it's a relationship coach, whether it's a money coach, whether it's a weight loss coach, it doesn't really matter. The point is that we're holding them accountable to the plan, and then we're checking with them on a daily or or, you know, two times or three times a week basis to make sure they're hitting their goals.
(18:36) So, that's something that's super high value. It is high cost to me because I have to scale people to do that. But do I think that the cost the value outweighs the cost? And in that example, I probably would because I think the number one issue that most people have is actually executing. So I I would really focus on holding them accountable so they could be successful, right? And so that is that is how I think through each of the uh the service delivery items when we're creating this final highval high-profit offer stack that
(19:00) we're going to be recombining together to make the core offer what we're delivering to our prospects. Okay? And so again, when we're defining value, we're thinking about this in terms of uh the the value equation. Is this financially valued with them? Would they think, "Wow, this is this is really cool.
(19:16) " Would they think that they believe they'd be likely to succeed when we're thinking through those value things that stack? Does it does it make them feel like they can do it without much lesser le without effort and sacrifice? Right? And then do we think that we can help them accomplish the goal and see the result they want in less time? Right? And so those are the four variables and we're thinking about each of those solutions within the context of those four.
(19:35) All right? And so for from a high cost low cost standpoint because I know I'm going to get questions about this. For me, especially in service, something is something has to be at 80% or higher gross margins. So gross margin is if I charge $100 for something, it has to cost me $20 or less to do the fulfillment, right? And you're like, "Wow, 80% or more?" Yes, because we have other costs running the business.
(19:56) So if you hope to have a 30% margin, then it means, you know, 20 20% is going to cost of goods. What you know, X% is going to go to cost of acquisition. You're going to market. you're going to sell. You have you have commissions. You have marketing teams. You have advertising. All that stuff is going to take up the next piece, right? You're going to have infrastructure pieces. You're going to have software.
(20:09) You're going to have, you know, admin admin. You're going to have finance. You're going to have billing, HR. And the thing is, especially if you're starting out, you want to make sure you should be the most profitable in the beginning because it's only going to go down with time because you're going to add more infrastructure.
(20:20) Right now, obviously, some businesses, this is a generalization. Some businesses become more profitable with time. It depends on, you know, if you have a software business, etc. I'm not getting into that. But in general, for most people starting out, you want to make sure that you have high margins, uh, because you're going to be adding people as you scale, right? And so, like I said, if if the cost of fill is $200, you need to be able to sell it for $1,000 to keep 80% gross margins.
(20:39) All right? And remember, the gross margin is the direct cost of fulfilling what you sell, not the indirect cost. Okay? So, if I if I sold a service of some kind, the person who actually fulfills that service is going to be the direct cost. The indirect cost might be rent, it might be software, it might be processing fees, it might be like those are all indirect costs.
(20:56) The direct cost is what? For what? If I added a hundred people to my thing, how many more people would I need to hire? That is my direct cost. My indirect cost is the other things that would would accompany that. All right? And so that's where your gross margin, you want to have at least 80% when when it's service.
(21:13) All right? Now, if it's physical products, it's a little bit different because you can sell more volume, etc. But for service, which many people are listening this are, you want to be at 80% or higher for gross margins. Okay? So, high value, low cost is the goal. And we want to stack as many of those solutions together as we possibly can.
(21:28) This is what it might look like, right? We have, you know, item one, two, and this one might be high value, high cost. The other ones are high value, low cost. Problem two might be we have one highv value, high cost, and the rest are high value, low cost, etc. Right? And so the examples on this low cost might be recordings, tools, swipe files, PDF videos, group sessions.
(21:44) High cost might be one-on-one, personally reviewing a sales call, personally reviewing a therapy call, personally reviewing 10 deals for your real estate coaching, going to your house and cleaning your pantry, take you on a tour of a grocery store to go shopping. Those are all high cost things.
(21:57) high value though, right? If I was if I was if I was if I were a real estate coach and uh I said, "Hey, I'm going to review your 10 deals and make sure that you pull the trigger on one of them with my sign off, then that would be high cost for me time-wise, but I'm going to probably perceive that as very high value because my number one concern is I'm going to make a mistake, right? If I'm a buyer.
(22:13) So, this would be something that I'd probably include is a high cost, high value, right? Now, I might have all my authorities, tools, swipe files, my calculators to see, you know, to show, but there's just something to be said about having that little extra piece of of trust that I'm not making a mistake. I'm reversing risk, increasing the perceived likelihood of success. All right.
(22:29) And so this is the second part, second half of creating your high-v value offer. We already had our problems. We listed them out. We found the solutions. We understand that we want to provide just a handful uh of of highv value clients, lots of value first, and then price position that, learn more about the prospects, figure out how we can deliver that in a more scalable way, but start at the top and then work our way down, right? We know the delivery vehicles, the how, and then we trim and stack for max value and profit. Okay? And so that
(22:54) includes step five, don't worry. There's all the sexy stuff is about to is about to come in the next one where we're going to cover bonuses, guarantees, scarcity, urgency, and then naming. But right now, if you're having offer and you're getting started, walk through this process. Look at the delivery cube and think about different and creative ways of solving the problems.
(23:08) And you can find more about this stuff on acquisition.com. I'll be I'll be posting blog posts in time. You'll also have this course is offers training. It's the advanced training. It's absolutely free at acquisition.com. You don't need to opt in. It's just yours. So enjoy and I'll see you next

CLASS 7 Bonuses - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=viup1V6NPXU

Transcript:
(00:00) What's going on everyone? Alex Fromoszi, CEO of Acquisition.com. We in a portfolio of companies. We help three to$10 million minimum companies scale to $30 million plus and beyond and scale and exit in three to five years. We believe that you should only have to get rich once if you do it the right way. And so that is what we are all about.
(00:15) If you're not in one of those categories, then this is for you. Okay? This is one of the the training on how to create offers that are going to increase your conversions, increase the likelihood that people are going to want to buy from you, and then increase your prices so that you have more profit left over.
(00:27) All right. so far. And you can find the rest of these trainings at acquisition.com. We went through picking the right market. We went through uh charging what it's worth. We deconstructed value so we can understand how to to deliver value in new unique ways. We figured out all the problems that our prospects have.
(00:41) We listed out the solutions and we figured out ways uh to provide the highest value solutions for the lowest lowest price. And we're going to start with the just selling a handful of people at a very high price to really dial in our process. And then it goes to the next piece. All right, which is bonuses.
(00:55) All right, so how do we get people to say yes today? Right? That's the that's the thing, right? How do we get people to say yes today? And so bonuses are really important. Something that I've learned more and more over time is that the reason that infomercials work the way they do where they say, "Hey, you know, you can buy this knife for $19, but you also get 38 other knives for free, right? Is that if I said you can get [clears throat] 38 knives for $19, it will be perceived as less valuable than you get one knife for $19 and another 38 knives uh for free,
(01:20) right? Right? And that's the and that's the thing is that it's it's using human psychology because what happens is there are two anchors that occur whenever you're making an offer, right? Their first anchor is a price anchor, right? Which is this is what you know this is what you get for this much, right? The other variable is the this is what you get piece.
(01:36) And so both of those get associated. Now, if we've done some sort of presentation before this, we talked about their problems, we talked about their sol, you know, what they're going through, we we match that with the solution that we're going to provide, then we have an anchor uh of the price that we're going to do it at and what we're going to get them.
(01:50) But here's the beauty of it is that by presenting this first, they're already kind of thinking about it. They're on the edge, right? And the person who who who best who best taught me this was Jason Flatley in in in one of his webinar trainings. The idea is that we want to we want to stretch the prospect's mind from this anchor that they had on the value because they're kind of thinking about it here, but now we're just going to stack and stack and stack and stack and stack because in their mind they were they were justifying the price of what
(02:16) we originally presented to them at the first offer, right? And so the beauty of this is that if you're ever selling, right, what you can do rather than offering discounts to get people to act today is you can give onetime bonuses. So this way you don't have to discount your price, but you can still get people to act with urgency.
(02:31) So I'll show you urgency stuff in a second, but from a bonuses standpoint, you can say, "Hey, if you act today, I'll give you this." Fair enough. Hey, if you act today, I'll give you this and this. Fair enough. And so you can keep asking for the sale and continue to make concessions of giving them more and more things based on the problems that they might present with.
(02:43) And so you don't need to give them all of the bonuses. you just need to give the bonuses that you are your your sales team is authorized to give etc uh to close more deals. All right, so let's let's dive in to to the bonuses section. So this will automatically make whatever you are presenting more valuable.
(02:57) So we're going to reorganize the pieces that we just went over because we had that big list of solutions. We don't need necessarily present that all of those together at once. We may present pieces of it and then have the other pieces be bonuses that we'll deliver later as the need as the need arises. So these things are coming with the purchase, but we're going to split them out to anchor value in a superior way to make it more compelling.
(03:18) All right, so here we go. So this is how you kind of think of it. So this is what you're currently offering in your mind, right? You probably have a current service that does all of this stuff, right? So instead, it's better to say this is the core thing and then these are the additional things. So it looks the same, right? But it actually is perceived entirely differently.
(03:34) It feels like they're getting five things here rather than getting one thing here. And human minds are not very good at understanding the intangible. All right? And so they can count numbers pretty easily. And so this shows more value. There are a lot of uh bullets here that I'm going to cover.
(03:47) Don't worry, you don't have to read them all. I'll just go one by one and we'll break through it. So the value of the bonuses should always eclipse the value of the core offer. All right? So psychologically, as you continue to add offers, it continues to expand the price of value discrepancy. Remember that price of value discrepancy.
(04:01) also subconsciously communicates the core offer must be valuable because if there are bonuses then the main thing has to be more valuable than the bonuses right no but you can use the psychological bias to make the offer seem wildly compelling so if for example my bonuses obviously far exceed the value of the core thing it will enhance the value of the core thing because bonuses are supposed to be less valuable than the main thing and so by them being more valuable obviously the person thinks well I guess I must have misunderstood
(04:27) the first thing because this must be more valuable than these other things because this was the core offer. And that's where you can use the psychological bias to increase the likelihood that someone buys, right? And so you can further enhance the value of your bonuses by adding scarcity and urges you the bonus themselves.
(04:41) All right? Which takes that technique and puts it on steroids. All right? So you can do bonuses with scarcity. So like version one would be only people who buy up for, you know, who sign up for XYZ program will have access to my bonus one, two, and three that are never for sale or available anywhere else except through this program, right? Another version of that would be like I have three tickets left to my $5,000 virtual event.
(05:00) If you buy this program, you can get one of the last three tickets as a bonus. You know, I've got this $5,000 ticket. It's anchored against a thousand product. Holy cow, this is a steal. I'm going to do it. Right? And then that's a bonus with scarcity. Scarcity is a limited number of units. Urgency is a limited number of time. It's different.
(05:13) That's what people mess up. And I'll get into more of that in one of the next videos. But bonuses with urgency. You say, "Hey, if you buy today, I'll add the bonus in that normally cost $1,000 for free." And I'll do that because I want to reward action takers. Right? You could also say, "Hey, with hope, you can see the subtle differences." Oh, sorry.
(05:26) this me saying uh you can see the subtle differences between the first two examples. All right, the first two were not constrained by time. The the last one is constrained by time. All right, they state that if you buy the program, you're going to get these things that you wouldn't normally be able to.
(05:39) Okay, unfortunately, I can't do one of the each of these one at a time, but I will I will break these down independently for you. So, bonuses, you always want to offer them. You can use bulleted bundle that we came up with at the end of section uh three, what we just talked about. You want to give them a special name that has a benefit in the title.
(05:54) So when I said, you know, how to grocery shop quickly so you spend less than you currently are. So you want to have the benefit of what this thing is solving in the title. You need to tell them what it is, but you need to tell the problem it solves. All right? So you want to tell them how it relates to their issue, what it is, what it's going to do for them, and how specifically improve their lives and their experience.
(06:09) Is it going to make it faster? Is it going to make their lives easier? Is there going to be less effort and sacrifice? Remember, this is talking about in terms of the value equation. All right. Uh providing some proof. So this can be a stat. It can be a past client or a personal experience to pro to prove that this thing is valuable. All right.
(06:23) So this is one where this is this is a little bit more in a pitching concept but you can also say this anecdotally as you're talking right so if you're selling someone you say hey you know people use this end up getting you know an extra YZ on their on their conversions if you're if I were selling a B2B product and so this is these are the some of the stats that like my sales team would have to know when they're presenting you know an extra bonus when they're trying to you know sell something right all right in one of our companies. The next is you
(06:44) want to paint a vivid image of what is it's like assuming that they've already made the decision and have already experienced the results. All right. So, you're you're telling them what it's going to be like when you're communicating bonuses once they're using the bonus, right? They already have used it and they're already experiencing the result.
(06:58) All right? And you always want to make sure you ascribe a price tag to it and justify that price, right? So, you really want to sell the bonuses that come along with it. Otherwise, they're not valuable. And this is one of the big mistakes I see a lot of people make is they don't talk about what their life is going to be like.
(07:09) They don't talk about this in terms of the value equation. They don't sell the person on why they're giving away this free thing. They're just like, "Oh, yeah. Here's this other thing that I'll give you for free, too." But we want to really tell them why it's valuable, right? The next is tools and checklists tend to be better than additional time and effort, right? And so shortcuts, in my opinion, things that have more sizzle, tend to be better.
(07:28) They're easy to understand and they don't sound like work, right? If I said, "Hey, you have I'm going to give you a bonus 100 hours of recordings." That sounds like a lot of work. But if I say, "Hey, I spent $50,000 on contract contract templates that you don't have to spend." Then they're like, "Holy cow, I just immediately get these things.
(07:42) " Right? So that's a lot of sizzle, but doesn't take a lot of time. Those are the right types of things that you would want to want to stack in bonuses when I'm providing something uh as a solution. All right. Now, each of the bonuses that you make, you shouldn't be making these willy-nilly. They should be addressing a specific concern or obstacle, which we already covered, but you're making sure that you're hitting every obstacle and the bonuses that align with those, right, in the prospect's mind about why they won't be
(08:02) successful. All right? So, the bonus should prove their belief is incorrect. All right? And that's where the stat, the personal story, etc. can stack and add value. And then this can also be what they would logically realize that they would need next. All right? So, if we're thinking about the the the bonus, right, some bonuses are going to solve their existing problem.
(08:19) Some bonuses are going to solve problems that they are going to encounter once they are successful. And one of the reasons I like this a lot is that it it assumes psychologically in the prospect's mind that if I'm solving the next problem that they're going to encounter once they have been successful with the core offer, it implies that they're going to be successful because why would I solve the next problem unless I was constantly solving the first problem? And so it increases their conviction, their perceived likelihood of achievement if I
(08:46) do if I solve the next problem too because they're like, "Holy cow, this thing must work." Because otherwise he wouldn't be trying to solve the next problem because the core thing wouldn't work, right? And so that's like there's so much persuasion that's being used in the bonuses that you stack.
(09:01) You want to be deliberate about it. Now, listen, don't obsess about this. You're going to you're going to mess it up the first time, and that's okay, and you'll get better. All right? But these are the things that I think through when I'm thinking about bonuses. All right? Always offer them. Give them a name. Tell them how it's going to relate to them. Give them some proof around it.
(09:14) Give them an image of how they're going to use it, how they're going to enjoy it. Always describe a price tag and justify it. Tools and checklists uh work better than more trainings. They should all address specific concerns, which if you did the process with the point, it would already do that.
(09:25) And then they should logically realize and become more persuasive that the core thing is going to work because this solves the next natural need. All right. Now, this is this is advanced level. All right. This is one of my favorite things in the entire world. I'm a huge fan of being an affiliate of other great businesses.
(09:39) All right. So people, believe it or not, so if I'm a chiropractor or whatever, people will give you their product for free for making an introduction to a new customer. Even better, they'll pay you to give away their products. Think about that. People will pay you to give away their products.
(09:55) Now, here's where this gets really cool. All right, so this is how I like to think about it in terms of bonus mastery. All right, so obviously all the things that we talked about earlier, those could be all things that you've already made and you've decided on providing, right? But if you want to use other people's products, you can actually bundle those into your core offering. So imagine this.
(10:10) Imagine selling I'm selling a $1,000 back relief, you know, program at my chiropractic, you know, clinic. But inside of that, I provide free massage services to three different massage parlors. I give a whole bunch of orthotics discounts to different products. I give a whole bunch of bands discounts.
(10:27) I have a low inflammation meal prep company that I that I have a partnership with. I have all these supplements that I'm going to have them buy through a discount code that I've already negotiated. And so all of a sudden I can show them that the savings alone from all of these extra bonuses literally outweigh the cost of what I'm charging them.
(10:44) So if I got 20 massage therapists, for example, right, to give me one free massage, then if they had 20 massages that were free, right? And a cost of massage is $60, then just that one line item would be $1,200 of real value. And here's what's even crazier. Those massage centers would also pay me to do that.
(11:03) And so I can make more money not just from my customer, but from the places I'm referring them out to and provide more value to the customer. It's a win wininwin. And that's why I love this stuff so much. Okay, so there's four levels of mastery to this process. The first is just giving other people's products away, which you can just start there and that's fine.
(11:20) The next level is giving other people's products away with pre-negotiated discounts or free units. So this is what I like to do a lot of times, right? It's like you not only am I giving you this, you couldn't get this from anyone else but me, right? It makes my offer more compelling and it's unique to me.
(11:34) The third is getting other people's products pre-negotiated discounts and getting paid for it. Right? So now it's like I'm not only am I giving you something that you can never get anywhere else and a discount that you'll never get, I'm also getting paid from that other business. Now the bigger you get, the bigger your clientele get, the more negotiating power you have.
(11:48) This is one of the most important things to remember is that you have the entire buying power of every client you currently have. A and B, all of your future clients from now until the end of time. And so that's a major leverage point when you're making negotiations with another business. And so you're like, "Hey, I sign up 20 clients a month.
(12:03) I could send 20 clients a month to you. What would that be worth to you?" Probably a lot more than just giving away the free thing, right? And so it's it's combining the fact that you're providing the discount to the customer and getting paid from the other person. So I might make $1,000 on my back relief, you know, uh, treatments that I have at my clinic, but I might make another $1,000 from other businesses sending me revenue for that person. So I literally doubled it.
(12:22) And here's what's cool about that is that all of that extra money is pure profit. There's no there's no cost of fulfillment. They're bearing the cost of fulfillment and simply paying because normally they'd have to pay a higher cost to, you know, Facebook or any other advertising platform that they're on. And so they'd rather just pay me instead of paying them, right? And that's what you need to talk about when you're negotiating these these deals.
(12:41) The fourth level here is other people's products. All right, with pre-negotiated rates and exclusive feature licenses. All right, so here's what's key. So this is like the most ninja level. you get other people's products for less that they give something exclusive or exclusive features that no one else gets, right? And you get paid affiliate commissions for doing that.
(13:02) All right, that is like level 10,000. All right, on this. And so this is just a case study that I did. So this is a coaching business. These are these are literally the things that we offer in one of our core bundles. So first off, we have pre-loaded landing page software with our exclusive templates. So they can't get them anywhere else.
(13:19) And we get affiliate commissions. Now, this one, I wasn't able to negotiate a discount, but I was able to get three of the other four, right? And so, if you think about this, think about these as checkboxes. Try and get all four, but at least try and get two or three with any one of the kind of affiliate advanced bonuses that I'm talking about right now.
(13:33) Another thing we offered was preloaded fulfillment software with our templates for fulfillment, right? This is uh this is for uh gyms and trainers where we gave them all the communications, all the meal plans, all the stuff already pre-loaded into fulfillment software. So, they didn't have to make anything. They literally just had it.
(13:47) And not only do they just have the materials because that would be like level one bonus, but they're already preset up to to be fulfilled with new customers. So, as soon as the customer gets added in, they already get all this stuff automatically. And the coach has to do less work. Remember, time, effort, sacrifice.
(14:03) We decreased all of those and they can't get them from anywhere else. All right. So, we got affiliate commissions. We didn't get a discount on that one. For this one, texting software with pre-negotiated discount. So, this one, I was able to get the discount and affiliate commissions. So, I got both, but I don't have custom features on this one.
(14:16) So this one's I don't have any uniqueness that was pre-loaded. Now we give them ways of using this platform, but I didn't have it pre-loaded. I prefer to have it pre-loaded. So that's like literally unique like no one else could get this stuff. The fourth example is messaging product. So this is for social DM. So we have another product.
(14:29) It's a software product that provides messaging with custom features that are only available to our clients. We get affiliate commissions for making the introduction and they end up saving probably $1,000 plus per month u by using this, right? Huge value. And then on top of that, pre-negotiated financing terms. So this is something that I did.
(14:45) I have all of these businesses that work with us, right? And so I go to banks and I say, "Hey, I have all of this revenue and I want to send it your way." All right? So these are And so what we did was I said, "Hey, these are the packages that I want our our businesses to be able to sell.
(14:58) These are the price points. These are the terms. What rate and approval amounts can you do for all of these businesses, right?" And so as a result of that, our our clients are able to get speedier approvals for financing for their clients, right? With pre-approved amounts and packages. Now, on top of that, we have an affiliate commission that doesn't affect them at all.
(15:17) So, they couldn't get um like it doesn't penalize them. We just get paid from that that company. And one of the beautiful things that I like about using other people's businesses instead of trying to build this business on your own is that you have the flexibility of always making sure that you're serving your clients the best.
(15:32) Right? So, if for some reason, you know, a new texting software comes out and it's better, I'm not beholden to this company. If anything, I can go to this company and say, "Hey, you need to fix these features or we're all going to leave." Right? And so it gives me this a ton of leverage to provide more value to my existing clientele without incurring the costs, right? And so it gives me ultimate flexibility.
(15:48) And the beauty is that from each of these products for the coaching business, right? We get paid on all of them, right? And so I've made millions of dollars that's pure profit from simply making introductions to to products that I probably would already have made introductions to anyways. Many of your clients are using things as a result of working with you.
(16:04) They're using other products and services as a result of the decision of working together. Right? I'm using weight loss as a simple example because everyone understands it. If someone signed up at a facility with a trainer, for example, they're going to probably look at buying apparel.
(16:15) They're going to look at buying gloves to not get calluses. They're going to look at buying supplements. They're going to look at downloading apps. They're going to look at uh meal prep services. They're going to look at all these other things as a result of purchasing this decision with you. And many of times, they're often asking you what they should get.
(16:30) And so, you might as well monetize that and make sure that they're uh picking the right stuff, right? Because otherwise, they're going to go to like you already have the advantage. You know which meal prep company sucks. know which you know supplements you like, you know which uh apparel you think is best. And rather than just referring all that money away, pre-negotiate, get an exclusive deal, they get a discount, you get paid, and you're going to use that to enhance the value of the thing that you're offering.
(16:53) All right? And so these are the types of things. This is advanced level bonuses, but I think these are so key and important that uh it was worth bringing up because I think they're they're so awesome. Okay? And note, I don't always get all four pieces of this in the bonus structure, but I usually get at least two to three.
(17:08) All right? So, that is the bonuses section of of how we position those in addition to the core offer. All right. So, you can find out more about this stuff at acquisition.com. We have more free courses. This is just the first free course. Over time, I'm consistently uh putting more out there. And the reason I'm doing that is because I just want everyone to be wealthy.
(17:22) I really do. I'm not charging for this stuff. I just want you to win. All right? And so, the first start of being successful is being able to initiate a transaction with a customer, which all begins with the offer. You can't market unless you have an offer. You can't sell unless you have an offer.
(17:33) So, we start with the offer first. All right? And so next video I'm going to talk about guarantees. All right? Because that's going to be the thing that is going to reverse people's risk, which is going to be always the number one object uh obstacle that anyone's going to encounter you with. Okay? So I'll see you in the next video.

CLASS 8 Guarantees - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rfdg9WbUcoE

Transcript:
(00:00) Alex Ramosi here from acquisition.com, CEO and founder. We have a portfolio of companies and we help three to$10 million at minimum companies scale to $30 million plus in three to five years for an exit. So they only have to get rich once. We are the guys who help you make your last dollar you ever need to make, not your first dollar.
(00:16) That being said, if you're not one of those people, then this is what this training is for you. All right, my goal is to get you to $3 million absolutely free because I just want to earn your trust. That is my transparent goal and I want to help anyone who doesn't have anything make money.
(00:29) And you don't even have to buy these, you know, expensive coaching programs. You don't have to buy courses. You don't have to buy anything. You can just use this stuff. And I can promise you it's uh probably better than the guys who make less than we do doing this. So, let's uh let's rock and roll into number seven. This is from the offers training, which you can see atquisition.com if you want it.
(00:44) It's absolutely free. You don't have to put an email in. It's just yours. Enjoy it. Let's go to we covered bonuses. We covered the market, charging what it's worth, getting the value right, grand slam offer part one and part two. This is the problems and solutions and what we're going to fulfill.
(00:56) And then how to structure bonuses and get other people's products to uh make you money. All right, so the next is guarantees. All right, so uh really really really important. All right, guarantees can make or break a business. Uh if you have a really compelling guarantee, it can it can 2, three, 4x sales. Um huge huge leverage point on selling.
(01:12) All right, and so we want to make guarantees that are worth their weight in gold. Okay, so your offer might not be actually making money because it's too risky for your prospect to buy. They don't think it'll work for them. All right, or they're afraid that it might not work for them. And so there's components uh of how you can improve your offer and make it irresistible by reversing risk.
(01:29) Right? If someone literally had no risk to do anything, that's why free is so compelling is that there's no risk. That's why free converts nine times higher than not free, right? It's because free reverses risk. And so guarantees are kind of like the backend version of that. So there's free on the front end and you could guarantee on the back end.
(01:45) And so you can reverse risk in two ways. Um and I'm going to show you how to do it. Okay. So the first type of guarantee is an unconditional guarantee. This is a guarantee that as it states has no conditions. It's a for any reason money back ask no questions guarantee. The second type of guarantee are conditional guarantees.
(02:00) These come in a lot more flavors. The unconditional guarantee is very straightforward. It's just no questions asked, right? The conditional guarantees have terms and conditions to them. That being said, they can actually be some of the strongest things for closing deals. And yes, since you asked, you can stack these guarantees and have multiple guarantees in a single offer, which is pretty cool.
(02:18) The third type of guarantee are anti-garantees um and performance related offers. So, I'm going to get to both of those uh because those are what I would consider implied guarantee. This is an anti-g guarantee, meaning all sales are final. These are unconditional conditional. All right, so those are the those are the things we're going to cover in guarantees.
(02:31) Hopefully, when you're thinking through your own offering, you think, how can I combine these aspects uh of the business and make my offer more compelling. All right, at the very end, I'm going to show you about naming guarantees. Okay, so always be bold about your guarantees, whatever they are. You should own your position.
(02:45) All right, and so there's always a winnable position in the marketplace. All right, so let me let me let me give you an example. So, if I were trying to compete against, you know, me for our software, right, Allan, I would say, you know, because we're far more expensive than everyone else and and and we're pretty big. That business does, you know, 1.4 a month.
(03:01) And if I were competing against me as a smaller player, I would say, Alex isn't going to give you any attention. He doesn't care about you. He's you're just a number to him. Like, with me, you're going to get all this personalized service, right? That's what like he's he's outdated. He hasn't, you know, like he hasn't been doing this like in the trenches in a long time. Blah blah.
(03:16) That's what I would do to try and, you know, discredit me. Right now, my position would be, why would you trust a guy who hasn't built a business? I've skied five of these, so I think I know a little bit more. The reason that we're number one in the space is because we are the best at it. Um, and so, do you want to go to the guy who's untested or you want to go to the restaurant that has 4,000 uh 4,000, you know, five star reviews? Which one do you want to go to? Right? And so there's always a position. Every position has
(03:37) advantages and disadvantages. Um, and so that is like every one of these has a has a has a has a position to it. So if I had an all sales or final position then I would say listen you know if you're the type of person who needs a guarantee then this is not for you like we're looking for a players and if you don't identify with that that's okay or you're like that would be one way of positioning another way would say you know the due to the nature of the information that we're giving you or the nature of the the program or the
(04:01) opportunity um we're going to be exposing some stuff that can't be unseen right and so once you see this stuff all sales are final because like you you will get the value no matter what the moment you get into it because we're going to be exposing some proprietary information that's back end that no one else has access to, right? And so that would be a reason to make sales final, right? And so that would be like all of these positions have a position of strength.
(04:23) Okay? So let's start with unconditional guarantees. All right? I 100% word for word lifted this from Jason Fladland. You're just such a G. I love you. You're such a a savage. I worded it differently when I would sell our unconditional guarantee. And I'll tell you how I worded it versus this way. I like both of them. You can use whichever one you like, but unconditional guarantee. All right.
(04:42) So, this is guarantee times time. The way I'll say the way I said it and I'll say the way that I I I heard him say it. I just think it's brilliant. If you can go buy his webinar course, it's phenomenal. But anyways, buy any any of his stuff. Um, but he says, uh, I'm not asking you to decide yes or no today.
(04:58) I'm asking you to make a fully informed decision. That is all. All right. The only way you can make a fully informed decision is on the inside, not the outside. So, you get on the inside and see everything's is what we say on this webinar is truly valuable. Now, you could replace webinar with this sales call or this conversation, whatever.
(05:11) And then if it is, then that's when you decide to keep it. If it's not for you, no hard feelings. You will then, you know, you know, after signing up at XYZ URL or like by signing this paper today, be able to make a fully informed decision that this isn't for you. But you can't make the decision right now for the same reason you don't buy a house without looking looking at the inside.
(05:27) Right? And know this, whether it's 29 minutes or 29 days from now, if you're not happy, I'm not happy. Right? And for whatever reason you want your money back, uh you can get it because I only want to keep your money if you're happy. All right? And all you have to do is go to Sport XYZ, give me my money, and in short order, we will send it back to you.
(05:39) All right? uh you can only make this kind of a guarantee when you're confident that what you have is the real deal. And I'm very confident that when you sign up at XYZ, uh you're going to get exactly what you need to dream outcome, right? And so this is the way that he positioned it, the way that I have positioned a lot of sales conversations because this is obviously a little bit suited for webinars.
(05:55) We do all of our sales via phone. I think that the biggest piece to remember is this first line or two because you know, let's be real, a lot of times you're not going to memorize stuff. You should, but you you know, if you're starting out, you might not have that skill set yet. is just saying, "Listen, I'm not asking you to say yes or no today.
(06:08) I'm just asking you to make an informed decision, right? Which you can only do on the inside." And the beauty of that is that people love delaying decisions. And so, you actually associate delaying a decision with a purchasing decision. So, in order for you to not make a decision, you have to buy, which is brilliant.
(06:20) And that's why, you know, Jason is so good at what he does. That being said, for us, if you have a money back guarantee, and this is why you have to own your position. So, if you have a money back guarantee, a satisfaction guarantee, a no questions asked guarantee, you need to own it. You it needs to be prominently featured and you need to stand by it.
(06:35) Okay? And so for us, I positioned it very much like a trial. I said, "Listen, like there's two no risk options for you today." All right? Option one is you can walk out the door. Option two is you can buy today, right? And at the end of the program, if you don't think it's worth it for you, then you get, you know, you got all this training, all this extra stuff absolutely free, right? And you can tell me on the last day you don't think it was worth it for you.
(06:50) All right, fair enough. Now, at this point, I would I would ask fair enough. And a lot of times, they say yes. If they still say no, I'm like, listen, well, either of these options are are are zero risk to you, but only one of them has the potential to get you where you want to go. So you have option one, zero risk and 100% guaranteed to not get where you want to go.
(07:06) The other option also has no risk but has a very high likelihood of getting you where want to go. Which one do you want to choose? Right? And by doing that I eliminated risk on both decisions and said only one of them can get you the outcome you're looking for. And so by doing that by making this decision today, you're actually choosing a no risk option that's going to get you where you want to go.
(07:19) All right? That is the value of unconditional guarantees. You can really think about this like a trial. Now you might think, well, oh man, I'm going to get all these people to refund. It really it's it's a math question. Most times, especially if you have a service component to your offering, then the likely that someone is going to refund or ask or request a refund is very low.
(07:40) I made this offer 4,000 times and I only had two people take me up on a money back guarantee out of 4,000 plus. So, the likelihood if you do a good job that it will cost you is very, very low. That being said, do it for a handful. And if you want, you can reserve it for only when you need to close the deal.
(07:54) So, if you're closing over the phone, you're closing in person. If someone's hesitant, then you can throw it in, right? And push them over the edge, which is oftentimes how I did it. I didn't do it on every sale. I did it on the sales that were on the fence. All right. Now, I should have recognized the two people that ended up I still remember them that said no.
(08:08) I pretty much stayed in the office with them for like an hour and a half to get them to to make the decision. And I probably should have just let them go. And so, understand that the math behind the guarantee is it's this. It's a calculated risk. All right. So, let me just give you an example. So, let's say that normally you're selling if you do 100 sales, you get five refunds.
(08:23) All right? just whatever the the numbers are illustrative. All right, so that means 95 net sales on 100 sales. Now, let's say you do the same offer with a guarantee and you make 130 sales, right? And you get 13 refunds. That's 10%. So, we doubled our percentage of people who refunds.
(08:39) That's that's a lot, right? We went from 5% to 10%. All right, but net we had 13 refunds and so we net netted 117 sales. So, it's 95 net sales versus 117 net sales. So it's a 23% increase in sales by adding the guarantee. All right? And so that's how we have to look at this. Is it a calculated risk? And inherently it is your business.
(08:58) So you should have more data than your customers do, right? And the more bullish you can be about this, the more uh convincing it is. And the more people uh and the beauty of this type of offer that I like from a psychological standpoint is I'd say, "Listen," and I used to say this all the time when I was selling prospects in person.
(09:12) I'd say, "Listen, I can only give this type of guarantee if we knew what we were that we were good. Otherwise, I wouldn't have the lights on and like this place would be empty, right? So, I know I can give this guarantee with confidence because I know you're going to love it, right? And you're going to achieve what you want because at the end of the day, if you hit this goal, you're gonna you're going to ask for a refund.
(09:25) They'll be like, "Hell no." Like, right? So, let's just get you started. You can't make a decision now anyway, so you might as well get started. I'm reversing the risk for you. So, let's get you going, right? Fair enough. Close, right? Boom. Okay. So, unconditional guarantees number one. Number two is conditional guarantees.
(09:39) All right. If you don't achieve X and Y time, we will. So, this is an important component of a conditional guarantee. And this is what I see a lot of people make mistakes on when they're marketing guarantees is they don't they don't actually tell what the condition is, right? You have to tell the condition to give it teeth.
(09:53) And so like if we say 100 sales guaranteed, but it's like over what time period or what. Now you might not be able to say the time period based on advertising laws etc. It depend on the platform. But if you can say it, you should say it right legally and for the for the components if you don't achieve X and Y time we will.
(10:09) They need to know what the teeth is. What are they going to get if they don't? So, a famous example, this is the Domino's uh guarantee, you know, 30 minutes or it's free, which is very clearly stated like if you order the pizza and it's not at your door in 30 minutes, the pizza's free, right? So, they understand the or what, right? You have to make sure that in the condition you say what the or what is.
(10:27) All right? So, these are the conditional guarantees that I have personally used. Okay? And these are some of my favorite ones. And so, you can lift them and use them however you want. All right? So, one is the outsized refund. So, that's like, hey, these are the conditions. So, if you go through the program, you watch all all the videos, you attend all the coaching calls, and you don't achieve X, I'll give you three times what the cost is of this program.
(10:48) Holy cow, right? And I can say that because I'm very confident that if you do all those things, you're going to be successful. Because the thing is is we don't want to make the conditional guarantee something that it's unrealistic for them to do it, right? Because then they're then it's it falls into the unbelievable category. It's like, well, I'm not going to do that, right? So, you want to make it stuff that's really reasonable.
(11:03) Now, the way that I factor my conditional guarantees is around activation. All right? And so what that means is when a customer uh we know for example that within our you know gym consulting business if someone makes a a sale of $2,000 or more in the first seven days the likelihood that they they stone with us for a year is super high right the same thing with Allen the software.
(11:24) If someone there's there's three points of activation. First is that it is live and functioning that they're seeing the stats the way they're supposed to be. The third is that they get their first person to show up for their client. And the third point of activation is they realize that they're getting they're making more money using a performance model than they are from a retainer model.
(11:37) So those are the three points of activation. And so we we we target around each of those points to move them through the process so that they are likely to stay. And so if I were making a conditional guarantee, then I would formulate the conditions around the things that are going to create those activation points. All right, this is really really cool stuff.
(11:54) Like this is the stuff that will make you a lot of money. All right, so this is this is how we structure this stuff. So the first is the outsized refund guarantee. All right, the second is a service guarantee. Love this guarantee. All right, which is simply if you don't achieve X outcome by Y period of time, I'll continue to work with you for free until you do as long as you X Y and Zed beforehand.
(12:09) Now, the X, Y, and Z, one of them is going to be that you made all your payments on time. Someone doesn't make their payments, then we're not, you know, the the re the the guarantee is void. Beyond that, you have to show up to all of the sessions that we have. If I'm guarantee that you we're going to fix your marriage, you have to show up to all the therapy sessions and you have to do the homework between the sessions.
(12:23) These are things that are activation points because I probably know that all of the people, you start with the people who were successful and you say, "What did these people do that people who weren't successful didn't do?" and you look at that and then you reverse the activation from that. So if you're like, well, I don't know what's going to activate my customers, look at your best customers, look at the things they did in their first period of time that other people didn't do and then build that around your activation process to get them on board and get
(12:40) them engaged and get them, you know, a big success and then referring and build testimonials and all that kind of stuff. All right, so you the guarantees guide your prospect to ideal actions. It tells them exactly what we want them to do. All right, and so the service guarantee works really well especially if you compare that with like additional purchases.
(12:58) So, for example, when I had the bonuses I was mentioning in one of my other videos, if someone's going to get X outcome, they have to use the preferred vendors that we want them to use. Cuz otherwise, if you're using someone else's stuff, I don't know if it's going to work. And it's not it's not because I I get an affiliate commission from it.
(13:09) It's just because like I pick those products because I know they work, right? And so one of the one of the cool things though is that if someone is using all of the vendors that we tell them to use as a result of using a service based guarantee, then even if I have to fulfill on the service based guarantee, I'm still getting paid from all of the other vendors that I refer the business to.
(13:27) So I actually can still do it at cost or even profitably during that period of time. So it's lower risk. That being said, the service guarantee is one of the strongest guarantees, but the things that make it or make it or break it are going to be the conditions around which you build it. All right. The third is the modi modified service guarantee.
(13:42) So this is saying that it's you have the service guarantee like we said before but it's going to be uh you know modified slightly for a period of time or they're going to get a a lower version of the service a after x period. All right so it's very similar instead of getting everything you'll get some some stuff credit based guarantee.
(13:56) So this one I like a lot which is if for some reason you're not you're not you're not satisfied or you didn't do x y and z I'll actually give you 100% of this money towards any other program that we have. That's a credit based guarantee a personal service guarantee. the more edified you are in your your respective space.
(14:11) For example, if I was working, you know, if if I had, you know, one of our businesses, I would say half the businesses people Yeah, half of my portfolio people know I exist. The other half the the clients don't know who I am. But in a business where they do know who I am and I've been edified in their minds, then I would say, "Hey, if you haven't achieved this outcome, I will personally work with you one-on-one.
(14:26) I'll give you one-on-one call every I'll just give you a one-on-one call." Right? So something like that can be perceived as very valuable depending on how edified you are in your in your prospect's mind because your personal service might be you know we charge 12,500 an hour for an hour of my time that I I I don't do it anymore because I now we just work with portfolio companies.
(14:45) But the point is is that that's going to be perceived the value of that's going to be perceived maybe even more than the the cost of the product. All right, next one. This is a great one for events. Um I actually got this from Frank Kern. Hotel and airfare perks guaranteed. So basically hey if because what's the cost? reversing risk around.
(15:00) Well, it's the it's the time of the travel, it's the hotel and the airfare. So, I'm I'm not only going to like guarantee that you're going to get value from my workshop, but I'm also going to pay you for I'm going to pay you for your hotel and your airfare if if you don't think it's worth it, right? And you could do this by like day one.
(15:13) So, if you have a two-day workshop, you can say by the end of day one, they have to execute that. So, that'd be a way of putting a condition in there so that if you want to do more stuff on day two, they have to leave halfway through, which also makes it less likely to do it. But it also from a selling standpoint it makes sense because you're like well you can't say you've been here two day like after the first day you're going to know if if this is for you or not. Right. Next one.
(15:29) I like this one a lot is the wage payment guarantee which is hey if this if this program doesn't do what we're saying it's going to do. I will pay you for your time for all the time that was spent trying to to do this program. The reason I like this is because one it's going to be based on the level of fulfillment that they did.
(15:44) I can see on the back end if someone consumes uh services and I can see on their schedule if they showed up for calls because that's based on having you know good data tracking for for fulfillment. So I can see that we spent two hours on the phone with them and they spent you know 6 hours going through materials and I say cool so we have 8 hours of wage payment that we need to refund for you.
(15:59) You know just send us your your tax return from last year and we will divide it out and we will we will pay that for you. Most people won't even do that but it but it's but it's sexy, right? It's different. The next is a release of service guarantee. This works really well if you have some sort of condition or contract, right? So, if you have a contract, you know, it's a 12-month contract or something like that, then you can say, "Hey, if we don't get you X by Y, then you no longer obligated to pay us for the remainder of the program,
(16:22) right?" So, that reverses risk around the longevity of the contract. Sometimes you don't want to do something like that because it might take time. Like, if you're in SEO space, takes time to get SEO to work. And so, we want to make sure that that the way the guarantee is worded is going to be aligned with how we can provide value, right? The light payment guarantee.
(16:37) I like this one a lot which is hey if you don't achieve X outcome by a Y period of time let's say that's the first week or two weeks or 3 weeks or 5 weeks you won't have to pay until you hit that right so it's like you're not out of the agreement but until you lose your first 5 pounds you don't have to pay me again right until you get your first sale you don't have to pay me again until you get your first lead you don't have to pay me again until you until like whatever whatever the first activation point is and again we tie these things to activation points
(16:58) things that are going to be likely that they're going to want to stay on with us because they achieved a precursor to a bigger result right and so it say hey you know until you lose 5 pounds pounds. Like you can pay today and you're not going to pay your next monthly payment unless unless you've lost at least 5 pounds.
(17:11) So once you've lost 5 pounds, then you can you can keep paying us, right? It's a nice guarantee because it reverses the risk around what if this doesn't work. All right? And this is the first outcome guarantee, which is similar. It's just that you don't have to pay at all until the outcome versus the delayed second payment, which is we're going to delay it as long as.
(17:25) It's similar uh but there's just a different nuance. Okay. Um those are conditional guarantees that I have used. I like all of them. You these are not exhaustive. There are many more uh guarantees that have been out there. You know, the more creative you can be with the guarantee, the better.
(17:39) These are these are all ones that I have used and have used. Well, I think I ordered these in order of like I really like 9 and 10. I really love one two one and two. The credit based one we've used a ton of. These are all guarantees that I've used. But you just need to reorganize it around these conditions.
(17:56) If you don't achieve X in Y time, we will Z, right? And you make the conditions the things that are going to make the person successful. Okay? So, anti-garantee all sares are final. I covered this earlier. The point is that you need to own the position and explain why it is that way. And sometimes when you do that, you can actually enhance the value of the thing.
(18:10) Like if you have this top secret thing, then once you get exposed to it, you can't unsee. These are proprietary things that like as soon as you as soon as you see them, it also makes it feel like there's less effort, time, and sacrifice to achieving the result, which means that that's why it's final.
(18:23) So it's it it's it's kind of like a damaging admission, right? In some ways, it's like, hey, we don't guarantee this uh at all because the stuff is so powerful, right? And so from a psychological standpoint, it makes the the the statement more believable because we're telling them why. Okay. And then the final type of guarantee, hopefully you can see it, is performance/v valuebased.
(18:40) And this is actually one of my preferred methods of guaranteeing things. And it's because I believe that all high performers want to do performance. Right? These are the relationships that I have with all the companies that I work with personally, the portfolio companies. And it's based on value, right? And I think winners always want to do it based on value because fund fundamentally they don't want to have a cap on their income.
(18:58) So it's like if I you know if I can get you from you know five million to $30 million a year and we can take you know from 3 million in enterprise value to to 50 million in enterprise value then like it doesn't really make a lot of sense for me to charge 50 grand for that. Like it's just not you know what I mean? Like it doesn't really make sense for me.
(19:15) So if you want to build a business you can build it around performance stuff. The software business that we have is all purely based on performance. the supplement companies only based on performance. So these are all things where it's where there's an implied guarantee because if the outcome is not achieved, they owe you nothing, right? And that's kind of the beauty of this is that you have an uncapped upside and there's no downside risk for the prospect.
(19:40) Now the important part about when you make these types of agreements is highly qualifying the prospects to make sure that they can be successful because otherwise you are fronting a lot of time right in doing this and that's why o over time as you get better and better that is the way to do it. The obvious second thing is you actually have to be good.
(19:56) If you're not good at at at achieving the result on a consistent basis then you shouldn't do performance at least not in the beginning. This is me being candid with you. I think everyone should be exceptional what they do or you shouldn't sell it. But I also understand that people's understanding of excellence changes over time because you get better and your understanding what excellence is improves.
(20:12) Right? I can tell you the first time I talked to a $250,000 employee versus a a $30,000 employee. There's no disrespect to anyone who's at either of those levels, but they they were more advanced. They had more value to provide. And so so too will you be at a $3 million entrepreneur level versus a $30 million versus a $100 million entrepreneur level.
(20:26) There's different levels to the game and different levels to understanding of value and how you can provide it. And so make sure that you're good at what you do, which is kind of the point of what I'm saying here. All right? And so this is an implied guarantee. There's anti-garantees, there's conditional guarantees, and then there's the unconditional guarantee.
(20:40) And so the idea here is that what we want to do is you can have all of these guarantees and stack them. You can say, "Hey, I'm not asking you to make a decision today. I'm just asking you to give it a shot." And if that's in 30 days and if 90 days you haven't made at least 100 sales or you haven't if you haven't lost 20 pounds in in 90 days not only that and you and you attended all of our you know whatevers you know or you you haven't fixed your marriage in 90 days or you haven't doubled your sex you know life in 90 days I will give you more than the cost
(21:07) you know two times the cost of program right but you have to attend all the sessions you have to do all the homework etc right so this one is you don't have to do anything this one is if you do this stuff uh and so these tend to work really well together we do this one is a shorter duration and then this one is a longer duration So, it's like this is your first 30 days, this is 60 days, or this is 90 days, or this is 6 months, whatever.
(21:24) You tie the guarantees together. Now, if you do an unconditional guarantee, you can obviously be smart about it and put parts of of your of your value after the guarantee period is over so that there's something to also hold them through that window of time. All right? And then you can't stack an anti-garanty obviously, but you can stack unconditional, conditional guarantees, and you can stack unconditional, conditional, and performance uh programs.
(21:46) All right? We already talked about the reason why all sales are final. the implied guarantee which is the value based guarantee we already talked about. There's performance that you can do in terms of units which would be like B2B be like only pay me X per you know X per sale X per show B T to C might be X per pound loss might be X per you want to have some kind of unit right so that would be one version of performance another one is a percentage of performance rather than based on units you do it based on percentage so I got 10% of topline right
(22:10) a lot of e-commerce agencies do stuff like that I get 20% profit share I get 25% of revenue growth from baseline so it's like you drive a baseline and then you have growth percentages and so there's different ways that you can spin this based on percentages versus units. This is what I think through when I'm thinking about value based billing and pricing. Okay.
(22:26) And then finally, just profit share percentage, which is x% of profit or x% of gross profit, which is different because that's the incremental sale, the additional sale that happens. So that's rev share, profit share, performance based on units. All of those are examples of implied guarantees because obviously if you aren't good at it, you wouldn't price that way, right? And then naming your guarantees.
(22:42) This is the last piece with guarantees is you want to have a cool name, right? So if you're going to give a guarantee, spice it up, right? Instead of using satisfaction or some other vanilla word, describe it more strongly. So, here's a generic example, right? So, a bad example would be like 30-day money back, satisfaction, irritate.
(22:58) Better example would be using creative imagery. So, it' be like, in 30 days, if you wouldn't jump into sharkinfested waters to get our product back, we'll return every dollar you paid. Another way of saying this, I got this from talking more. Love it or leave it. Um, which I just I I like that. I like that wording a lot. The next uh name uh would be creative imagery number two would be like, hey, you'll get our famous club a baby seal guarantee after 30 days of using our services.
(23:17) If you wouldn't club a baby seal to stay as a customer, you don't have to pay a penny. So, you can see how there's marketing behind some of these things that increases the perceived value and how much it stands out in the customer's mind. If I just say I have a 30-day money back guarantee, people forget what that even means, right? What does that mean? What it means is if you wouldn't jump into, you know, XYZ and just talk invested a product, then you will um you get what I'm saying, right? Okay, cool. So, naming guarantees.
(23:41) And then last piece is stacking guarantees, which is the advanced piece. I like doing both. You know, you could do unconditional for 30 and then conditional for three times your money if you X, Y, and Z. When you stack these things, it's an advanced move. This is a calculated risk, but you should know that and just do your math.
(23:55) But what I like about this a lot is you can future pay someone based on the duration of your conditional guarantee. So, if I have them, you know, if I have a six-month conditional guarantee, it seeds the idea that they're going to be staying for 6 months plus. It also gets them thinking about long-term success rather than short-term success, which I will tell you right now, if you can frame and attract prospects who want long-term success and not short-term success, you'll be far more su successful and make more money and
(24:19) you'll have way better customers, way better stick rate. The most successful campaign that Jim Launch ever ran and we probably should run it again because of course entrepreneurs, something worked really well and we didn't do it again was a campaign called the one year later campaign which was I showed videos from clients who've been with us for over a year and we just flooded the newsfeed with videos from people who had been with us over a year.
(24:38) And the thing is is when you show one year later videos, I mean, the the before and after on a year is huge. And what it does is it allows prospects who are new to already be future paced a year ahead of time. And they also come in with a year-long expectation. And so they're not saying you have to save my business tomorrow, right? It's saying I need to put these systems in place to grow my business over time.
(24:58) And those are going to be the people who are going to be wealthier in the long run. They're going to be easier to work with and ultimately are going to be more successful and not make you want to kill yourself. So that's the advanced move of stacking guarantees. And yes, you could do conditional six-month, you know, 10x ROI if you X, Y, and Z.
(25:10) And you can stack two conditionals, right? You can do a a 60-day conditional and a six-month conditional, right? And again, you're going to stack the terms based on the things that you'd want them to want them to do during that period of time. You're going to guide your prospects to be successful through the wording of your guarantees.
(25:23) All right? And right, I could do a first outcome guarantee with a second outcome guarantee of 30 days and 60 days, right? I could do small outcome of changing changing the terms if you only do X and a big outcome of if you do XXX. Right? So that's that's two different guarantees that are based on outcome, not based on time.
(25:37) All right? And so that is just a handful of examples of how you can stack guarantees. Hopefully you learn a lot more about guarantees than you've ever thought you even would ever know need to know in your life. That is the point is that there are there's levels to this game. That being said, you can find out more about this these trainings and other trainings we have.
(25:51) They're all absolutely free at acquisition.com. There's no optin required. I just want you to succeed. And if you're a 3 to10 million business and you're looking to scale and exit in three to five years and only have to get rich once, make the last dollar you ever need, then uh hit us up.
(26:03) Otherwise, keep being awesome and I'll see you in the next video where we break down scarcity and urgency, which is how to decrease the decision-making time for your prospects to get them to buy today. All right, see you next video.

CLASS 9 Scarcity & Urgency - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ceQid5rJy-w

Transcript:
(00:00) Welcome to the channel. My name is Alex Rozzi, founder and CEO of acquisition.com where we own a number of companies done 120 plus million in the last four years. And now we help three to10 million entrepreneurs scale and exit so they only have to get rich once. If you are below $3 million, what we're going to talk about today is one of the components of making your offer more successful so that you get more sales, get more leads, and you get more people to say yes at higher prices.
(00:23) All right? And so one of the components of that, we've already gone over picking the right market, charging what it's worth, the value uh equation, how to how to deconstruct and recreate value in the offer with high margin, how to stack bonuses, how to use guarantees in a way that is compelling and unique. And today it's going to be increasing the scarcity and urgency.
(00:39) All right, so this is how we get people to make faster decisions. This increases our cash conversion cycle. So if we are spending money on advertising, we want to get that money back as fast as possible. So part of that is decreasing the time for people to make decisions, right? And so two components of that are going to be scarcity and urgency, which is a function of units and time.
(00:53) All right? All right, so that's what we're going to go through today. If you like this stuff, you can find out more at acquisition.com. All my stuff is free and it's because I don't need your money and I just want everyone to be wealthy. Crazy, I know. Okay, so offer component number eight, scarcity and urgency. So, let's rock into it.
(01:06) So, you might not be making money because your prospects are not buying fast enough, right? They need to make faster decisions in order for your market to be profitable. All right, and so the two components of this are urgency, right? Which is, you know, you have to make a decision by X date or X time. And that's like 5 3 2 1.
(01:19) There's countdown timers. You're you're they're telling them there's X date they have to decide by. And the other component of that is scarcity. How many spots or how many units you have left. All right? So this is one is a function of how many of a thing there are units and the other one is a function of time. All right.
(01:31) And you can use both of them successfully. So let's start with urgency. So there there's four common reason why that work that we've seen work really well. And so they mirror the four components of like these are these are what I look at when I'm creating urgency. So you have the group of clients.
(01:49) You have the season that you're in literally like season of time like spring, summer, fall. You have your your urgency around pricing and bonuses. And then you have urgency around the opportunity. So these are the four different ways you can create urgency ethically without you know giving up your integrity. All right. So the first is around the group. Okay.
(02:04) So this is where you have rolling cohorts. So you say, "Hey, our next group starts on Monday. So let's get you in." Right? And so this would be something where like or the next group starts on on in two weeks, whatever it is, right? And so if you happen to always start like most businesses already have these cadences, right? And so most businesses already have limits around time and they also almost always have limits around amounts like and let me give you an illustration.
(02:28) If right now you have a business and I said I will send you 1 million customers, right, for your business, your service business, you probably couldn't handle it, right? And so then what we would say is let's define what the actual amount of units you could possibly take is let's define that and now let's let's tell people that, right? because you already have a limit naturally in your business.
(02:46) So you might as well market it and use it to create scarcity, right? That's scarcity which is the next moment. But to the same degree, you probably have a cadence around which you deliver services. You probably do it every week you have new customers. Every or every day or might be every every month you open a new thing or I I've got some friends who have big schools and they do uh once every six months they do.
(03:04) So two times a year they have a new cohort that begins. And so having rolling cohorts allows you to use urgency to get someone started. It's not saying you'll never do it again. It's just saying that this next group starts. And the nice thing that I found in my experience is that when I was selling, you know, brick and mortar, in person, things like that.
(03:20) The fact that I always had another group starting, you know, the next Monday, I it didn't matter what day of the week it was. So, if it was like Friday, be like, "Hey, let's get you in because it started on Monday." And if someone came on Monday, I'd be like, "Perfect. All right. So, you you have seven days to enjoy yourself, relax, and, you know, get ready to rock and roll because Monday we go live, right?" And so, by doing that, I always had a nice reason why to get them to make a decision today and not have to think about it. All
(03:39) right. The next is rolling seasonal urgency. All right, this is where you're saying, you know, this promotion is over. This season, this promotion could be our Valentine special. It could be our New Year special. It could be our spring to, you know, spring forward in March special. It could be our April shower special.
(03:55) It could be our get ready for summer special. It could be like all of those are seasonal urgency that we can say. It's similar to this except just has a different flavor. And that's kind of the idea here is if we can change the way the urgency feels, it'll always seem authentic. But notice, we're not doing anything unethical that's not in integrity.
(04:10) We're just simply saying, "Hey, we have our Valentine's Day special that's starting next month or Valentine's Day special is ending in 3 days. Let's get you in." Now, that being said, we might have a very, very similar offer that starts next month, but it's going to be under a different name. And so, as a result, this promotion will end, the next promotion will begin.
(04:25) And so, that gives us urgency around that. All right, which leads naturally to the next one, which is this is around the the unit of time and around the promotion itself, the pricing and the bonuses that are associated with it. So, we might have bonuses that we swap out. So, let's say I have 10 bonuses that I give people and I give five people, sorry, five bonuses for month A and different five for month B and then I and and month C, I'd go back to the the first five again.
(04:48) So, I might have these bonuses that no, they're no longer going to have access to if they don't make a decision. And so, they probably want those bonuses. And so, it's like, hey, we'll make a decision because this promotion comes with these things which will be gone at the end of the month. So, you should get in on that, right? And so, that also functions the same way with pricing.
(05:04) So if you have a specific discount or a specific starting price, then you can utilize that. So a fun easy example for this is like how you can variate this stuff. This is especially important in local markets because you have such a limited audience that you have to cycle through promotions quickly.
(05:17) So you want to change the flavor of it based on the month. You can also change the flavor based on the name. You can change the flavor based on the pricing. So if I had a $19 new client special versus a $29 new client special versus a $1 new client special versus a free start or free first session, all of those are different variations, but they're going to feed into the same business model.
(05:32) and more they don't really make any difference to us but it looks different to the prospect and so it actually allows us to get people to take action faster. All right and then finally you have an exploding opportunity. All right and this is I mean if you can get this one this is the most powerful of all of them which is that you have a you have a real reason why this opportunity that you're that you're selling them on is going to disappear, right? So an example of that would be let's say eBay and Amazon there's a price discrepancy. So
(05:57) that means that if on eBay I can get or Craigslist and Amazon whatever I can I can buy things at one price and I can sell them at another price and they're far there's a huge discrepancy between those prices that is arbitrage right so I don't really have to do a lot of work I just take from one place and sell to another place and I might be selling an opportunity around this and say listen guys like you can buy this today you can buy this tomorrow you can buy this next month but the thing is is the opportunity might not be here it's going
(06:18) to consistently shrink over time and so the sooner you get in the more of this wave you're going to be able to ride before it crashes because eventually the opportunity is going to disappear as all great opportunities do right and So this is an exploiting opportunity which implies urgency was why they should act today right and so if you have a unique way of marketing you have unique markets uh for example that you are exploiting the buying and selling between two different price points those are the ways that you can create an exploiting
(06:41) opportunity and that is how uh you can build urgency those four ways into your offering. All right the next piece of this is scarcity. Now you can do both of these obviously you can just do scarcity you can just do urgency but scarcity comes down to a limited number of supply of seats or units.
(06:56) Right? So that's of places that you have the ability to service. This is why this is so important is to define what your current limited capacities are. So define your limits, define the constraints, and then market those constraints so that you can tell people. Like for example, you might find out that your if this is especially true if you have brick and mortar, but really any service business, you only have a certain amount of capacity.
(07:15) Like let's say you only have one more rep who's a media buyer, right? And that person's already threequarters taken up, right? Well, you could say, "I only have 25% capacity left on one guy uh before I have to hire someone else." So, like this is pretty much like if you want to get one of the last spots, you should just get get in today so you don't have to delay and we can just get you going, right? It also shows that other people have already made the decision.
(07:34) So, it gives social proof. And so, you're stacking these resources you already have. This is the sawdust of your business. This is the excess capacity that you're not communicating to increase scarcity so that it speeds up people's decision-making process because they're like, "Oh, darn. Well, I really want to make this decision faster because there's only a limited amount of seats left." All right.
(07:50) Another thing that you can limit, right, is gonna be the supply of bonuses. So, this is just like the urgency bonuses before, but this is just applied with scarcity. So, it's like I may have a limited amount of these things or I could choose to limit them. My opinion is it's better to have a limited amount.
(08:02) This works especially well with physical product premiums. And what I mean by that is if you're a brick-and-mortar business, you could have t-shirts, you could have I mean, that's a very simple example. You could do obviously other stuff. You could have bands, you have orthotics, you could have anything that would naturally go with the purchase.
(08:13) They say this is a bonus if you buy today, right? But we only have x amount of them, right? And people can understand physical limits of unit constraints because that makes sense from a scarcity. Otherwise, we got to wait another month before we get another offering and I don't know if we're going to be able to have them blah blah blah.
(08:26) And so people say, "Well, I was going to think about it, but if I can get this thing today, then I'll go forward with it." Right? And then the final way of having scarcity is just never available again or one of a kind. All right, so this is really interesting because of the NFT world that exists with non-f fungeible tokens, uh, which is going to be huge in the future, but it's going to be massive.
(08:44) But anyways, those create one of a kind products, right? That's why art is so, you know, can can go to egregious prices because there's only one, right? They are limited edition. That's why when you're doing uh if you have a physical products business, you do flavor drops and you'd only one time only and it's limited supply and then once it's once it's gone, it's gone.
(08:59) If you were in the apparel business, you could do a single unique design on a t-shirt, drop it, only have a hundred and sell out. And you'd literally sell more of those thing than if you had every single t-shirt that you'd ever made posted on a site because scarcity drives purchasing decisions. So, another example of this, I'm going to keep driving this home because it's important.
(09:16) And scarcity comes down to supply and demand, which is one of the most powerful powerful forces in all of buying, right? Is supply and demand, if if not the most powerful, right? And so, what we're doing is we're leveraging supply and demand to our favor. We're purposely limiting supply to increase to increase that ratio in our favor.
(09:32) So, I'll tell you one story. When I was at Arnold Schwarzenegger's house, he was we were doing this charity event. It was $25,000 a ticket. I was talking to one of his his his his biggest donor at the event besides me and this guy came up to me, super weathered business guy, really cool, owned an exotic watch business. And the CEO of the of the charity came up to me and said, "Hey, this is, you know, so and so, you should meet him.
(09:54) " He was the one who gave me the advice of raising the ticket prices, right? And it was because the last year it had sold out. And so what they did was they cut the tickets, the amount of tickets that they sold, I think, in half. And they more than doubled the price. So they went from, I think, $10,000 to $25,000.
(10:07) And they cut the the number of tickets by it might have been less than 50% but they cut they cut the number of tickets. And so the guy smiled this that this amazing it was just like this he was very proud of himself and of the of the owner and he he said yeah whenever demand increases cut supply. So think about that whenever demand increases cut supply.
(10:26) And I always thought about that and this guy had a bazillion dollar fine jewelry business. And so it was all in selling unique and rare pieces. And so he he understood supply and demand better than just about anyone. And this is especially true in the high-end space, which is what most people who are watching this would like to get into. You'd like to charge more for your for your products and services.
(10:40) And so, one of the things to look at is look at look at Louis Vuitton, look at Chanel, look at some of these brands that have been around forever and see how they create this. So, if you go to a Chanel store, for example, which is wildly overpriced, but if you go to a Chanel store, they only have one to two of every item in the store.
(10:56) And they don't even tell their stores what they're going to send them. And so, what they do is they create genuine scarcity around every product they have. And so if you walk in the store and you really like a purse, it might not be there tomorrow because it's the only one. And so they they don't actually only create one of these purses, but they don't sell online.
(11:10) They only sell through their distribution outlets. And if you walk in there, every store is different because they all get different pieces. And whatever they get could be gone after that day, right? And so they create, they engineer scarcity, right? Debeers, the biggest diamond uh you know, importer there, 75% of the world's diamond supply comes through Debeers's mines.
(11:30) They purposely limit the supply of diamonds that go to the marketplace so that they can maintain higher higher margins on those stones because it turns out the diamonds are actually far less rare than rubies and sapphires and other gemstones. But they literally have artificially created the scarcity.
(11:43) So huge businesses have been doing this for centuries and it's worth studying because if you can if you can control the supply to demand curve, you can charge whatever you want, right? If there's only one of you and there's an unlimited supply or demand for your for your time, then you can you can you can benefit from that and ultimately get people to make decisions faster.
(11:58) All right. So, limited supply of seats or units, limited supply of bonuses, and then never available again or one of a kind or the ways that you can add scarcity into your service, right? And so, this can be this is where uh product drops or NFTs and things like that in the future will become really really uh killer.
(12:14) Okay? I think I talked about physical products versus services, physical products is everything I just explained with Chanel and all that stuff. If you like that's why Amazon says how many are left, right? They they they put scarcity on the page so you know. And then with X spots left, you have to just say how much you could possibly take.
(12:29) So if you have an agency, for example, then you'd say like, well, I can only handle 10 clients a month. So if you already have eight clients that have been sold, then just tell them that you only have two spots that you can possibly handle this month left before you have to hire someone else, which means you're going to pause.
(12:41) You might as well get in now, right? And so this gives and it's like and that this guy's awesome and that's why he's almost booked out, right? So social proof, it shows expertise and it shows demand. All of those things lean and tip the scale in your favor to get someone to make a faster decision with you today. All right.
(12:55) So, with services, I like to do only, you know, if you can only take 100 clients, then then say that you can only take 100 clients. This is a a beautiful thing that if you have like a higherend program or whatever and you want to keep it to an exclusive amount, name the group by the amount and just say, "I'm only doing that.
(13:08) " And it creates scarcity and people also don't want to leave you. Especially with recurring, you can create scarcity around retention to keep people longer by saying you're limiting it to x amount. All right? Another version of this is just x clients per week. We only can handle 10 clients a week and then after that, we got to put you to next week.
(13:22) So you just reverse engineer this number, but you can still be honest and genuine about it. All right. Another one would be only Y clients per cohort, right? That start whenever the defined period. So I said per week versus per cohort just to simply show that you can you could have this level of scarcity per group that starts in two months or starts every six months, right? And so these are just nuances of how you can use this in services.
(13:41) You can have a total cap, you can have a cap on the limits per time, or you can have a to a cap on the actual uh total number of people. So, those are the different ways that you can slice and dice the scarcity in a service business ethically without lying to prospects, which you do not want to do. Okay, so urgency of scarcity, that is how you can increase the likelihood someone's going to buy faster, uh, increase your cash conversion cycles and get people to ultimately buy from you.
(14:01) All right, so we got both of those covered. You can find more of these trainings at acquisition.com. They're absolutely free. I just want you to make money. If you're, you know, three to$10 million business and you're trying to scale and exit in three to five years, we'd love to help you out. That is, that is what we do.
(14:15) We've, you know, we have five eight figureure businesses now. And so I just want to help you win. And maybe by the time you're listening to this, we might have more. So, who knows? That being said, we've already covered all these things for how to create offers so that you can get higher conversions, higher sales at higher prices.
(14:26) And the last component of this is going to be the magic gaming formula. All right, which is going to be in the next video. I'll see you there.

CLASS 10 Naming Products - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FtAxAQ-ZOwg

Transcript:
(00:00) Welcome everyone. My name is Alex Ramoszi and I'm the CEO of acquisition.com. We own a portfolio of companies. We've done over 120 million in sales just from our companies alone. And I have nothing to sell you. And so we work with three to$10 million companies to get them to profitable exit in three to five years.
(00:15) And what I want to do is share the frameworks that have worked to help them get more customers, make more money per sale, and differentiate themselves from the the competition. And the offer is a core piece of that. And so if you're new or you're less than $3 million a year, in the last few videos, what we talked about was how to pick the right market, how to charge what it's worth, deconstructing value, creating grand slam offers, part one and part two, which is basically understanding their problems, understanding how to create
(00:36) solutions to those problems that are scalable and profitable, recackaging, combining those things with bonuses to provide more value and perceive value in in the prospect's mind. guarantee and and reverse the risk through conditional and unconditional guarantees that you can stack together.
(00:50) Creating scarcity and urgency in order to get them to act and buy today to increase our cash conversion cycle so we can make more money faster and we can return our capital faster to us so that we can redeploy it. And so finally, the last step in this process is what I call the magic naming formula, which is how do we do this in such a way that the prospects will know that what we have is specifically for them.
(01:08) Right? So for me, obviously I just work, you know, I'm I'm looking for portfolio companies, but for everyone else, I'm just trying to give stuff uh to you guys for free. so you can make money. And so I try and call that out to a certain degree. And to the same degree, you want to do this with the offers that you're putting out.
(01:20) Or at least this is what we found effective with the companies that we work with. And so one of the reasons that your offer might not be actually making money is because your prospects don't know it's for them, right? And or they don't know what problem you are solving for them. So it's either one of those things.
(01:32) So it's they don't know it's for them, they don't know the problem that you're solving for them, or they don't know how you're going to solve that problem. Uh and if it's a way that they actually like it. And so what we want to do here is make our prospects know their office the the converse of that, right? Make it make them know that it's for them, that it's going to solve their problem the way they want it to be solved.
(01:49) And that last piece is really important because people want problems to be solved in certain ways. So for example, I'll give a breakdown of this really quickly and then I'll get into uh how to name your name your bonuses and name the the programs and promotions well so that so that you get higher conversion rates. But when we were, you know, serving the fitness space exclusively, we don't do that anymore, but we found out that if a prospect came in for let's say a gym membership and they what they really didn't what they didn't come in for is a gym membership.
(02:14) They came in to lose weight, right? So the there was a bigger outcome, a bigger need that they had and then we tried to sell them into a gym membership or some sort of training services. Now, here's what's interesting is that if the person said no and then we said, "Hey, can we just help you with your nutrition instead? Don't worry about it.
(02:29) Free on us. We just provide goodwill." They said, "Sure." And what was interesting is that people would come back a day or two later and we'd give them a nutrition consultation and we'd actually sell them more product than the average client who came in for training services. All right? So we made literally people would on average buy 200 some dollars worth of supplements if they had just bought training services and they would buy on average $300 plus if they hadn't bought anything.
(02:54) And so I think that tells us a couple things. One is just because someone doesn't want to buy the core thing that you have doesn't mean they still don't want to solve the problem. they just might want it to be solved differently. On top of that, it showed us that those people actually valued that more, which is why they were more willing to spend money on it.
(03:08) You could also make the argument that they hadn't spent money on the first thing, so they had more in their kind of budget left over. We've always taken the stance that people buy and make purchasing decisions out of different perceived wallets, right? Like you have a gym membership wallet, you have a grocery wallet, you have a supplements wallet.
(03:22) These are additional wallets and budgets that people have in their mind. So, you actually don't tap out one uh like you're not actually stealing from another place. it's actually a different budget, which gets into a whole another category of stuff that I won't get into during this video, but um it's good to understand.
(03:35) So, we want to make sure that we're letting them know that we're going to solve their problem the way they want it to be solved. And so, the way that we do this is what I I use the the magic headline formula. All right? And so, this is not just like headlines for ads. It's kind of just a naming formula that you can use for all sorts of things.
(03:49) All right? And this is been really effective for us in making things. And so magic is an acronym for M make a magnetic reason, A announce the avatar, G give them a goal, I indicate a time interval, and then C complete with a container word. All right. And so the whole idea here is that we want to we want to let the people know.
(04:06) So this is announce the avatar, what we're going to accomplish for them. That's the goal. In what time, the time interval, and we're going to give them a reason why we're doing this thing, and we're going to complete with a container word. And there's no other sexier way to say that, but almost always we have some sort of container where that that combines all this stuff together.
(04:22) All right? And so let me dive into a couple examples. Note, uh, everything you do needs doesn't need to be named this way, but it's just very useful when naming programs and promotions for advertising. Like not every single thing you do has to do that follow this formula, but I've seen it be very effective, especially on a on a niche and local level, and very, very effective for naming bonuses.
(04:38) So let's try and go to a couple examples here. All right, so category one, we have like wellness. Everything that's wellness. I try to take big big chunks of the marketplace here. So, these could all apply. Hopefully, you can see these from the screen. If not, I'll read them out loud.
(04:51) But like a free sixe lean by Halloween challenge. All right. So, in this I don't have the avatar called out. And so, this is a good note is that I try and get as many of those components in, which is why word selection can be so important, but you're not always going to get them all in. So, I try and get at least three or four of these in.
(05:04) If I can get all five, awesome. If I can't, it's okay. Another would be like 88% off a 12week bikini blueprint. All right. So, I've got my promotion here. I've got my reason why. I've got my uh my goal, which is the bikini. I've got the blueprint, which is my container word.
(05:17) And I've got my duration of time, which is 12 weeks. Right? If I say free 21-day mommy makeover, then I know my makeover is my container word. The makeover also double functions as the end goal. So, I get two out of that one, which is why word selection is so important. 21 day, I've got my time interval, free, I got my reason why, and I got mommy, right? So, my call my avatar out.
(05:34) 60-minute make your friends jealous model hair system. All right? So, it's going to tell I'm telling them how long it's going to take. I'm telling the outcome is make your friends jealous. And then the model hair system is the is the system is the container work. Right now this one I didn't get to call out who this would be perfect for, but you can imagine already this is probably not a guy's product.
(05:51) Make your friends that could be, you know, depending on level, but that's probably in the middle mid- range. So let's go on to the next one. Uh 6 week stress release challenge. U that's a really simple one. That was a promotion that worked very well for one of our Kity businesses that we worked with. Free bend over painfree in 42 days healing fast track. All right.
(06:09) Right? So, this would be maybe for a pain clinic. All right? And so, these are just examples of kind of using these things as headlines, for advertisements, as leadins, the copy, etc. All right. For doctors, it might be $2,000 off celebrity smile transformation. Lakeway moms, $1,500 off kids braces. Uh 12 month to a perfect smile, $1,000 off for 15 families. That's a nice reason why.
(06:28) But, back to school free braces giveaway. These are all really interesting things. I'd be like, "Oh, wow. Back to school." Like, there's a reason why. I see the promotion. I see what the end goal is. And then the giveaway is the power word. So, it's like I've got four of those components in that in that thing.
(06:40) It'll probably work very well. Grand opening, free, reason why, free X-ray treatment, uh, instant relief. So, that would be I've got the benefit. I've got the the thing, I've got the reason why, grand opening. And so, these are all effective headlines, right? And I'll I'll give you a couple coaching ones. Five clients in five days blueprint, seven figure agency, 12week intensive, 14-day to find your perfect product launch, fill your gym, and 30 days free.
(07:01) Right? And so, these are all different things. These are headline formulas um that we've used really, really effectively over time. And so what I want to do here is take a quick note on the time interval. So this is just something that you know the nuances that you develop with doing this a lot is that I found that for bonuses you want to think in terms of seconds, minutes, hours.
(07:19) So each So I might have a program that might be one thing and then within that program I have a um clear your inbox in 30 30 minutes if I was like selling something to an agency or some sort of business thing, right? And so here the overall program might be in days, weeks, months, right? The overall system might be days, weeks, months in terms of what the system is or even quarters.
(07:39) But the subtopics, the things that are going to solve the problem within the system will be looking at seconds, minutes, hours. So if you can here's my big system, which is maybe a six-month transformation of some sort, a business transformation, a marriage transformation, a a health transformation, a IT trans, whatever it is, right? There's a transformation that people are trying to buy a gap between where they are and where they want to go.
(07:58) Now, the subtopics, the bonuses, the features underneath of that are going to be many transformations that all lead up to the larger transformation. And these are things that we should know more about than the prospect. Again, just like the bonuses section, these things will also create more assumption that that what we are doing is effective because if we start solving problems beyond the problems they have, they're going to believe that we can solve them because we're already solving the next thing.
(08:19) All right? But with those, breaking them down so that the micro components lead into the major component tends to work really well. And there are lots of things that if you actually think about it in these time frames, you know, in seconds and minutes and hours, it makes things so much more compelling. So, let me let me give you a quick example of how time can can literally make something more interesting.
(08:36) So, if I said I had a hairspraying system, like, you know, looking like a model, a process, right? And I've been doing this for 20 years and I'm really good at it, right? If I said, "Hey, I'm going to give you my my hairspraying system that makes everyone look like models." That's cool, right? But if I say I have a hairspring system that takes 10 seconds instead of 10 minutes, then all of a sudden this thing is significantly more valuable, right? And so that's why time is such a critical component to creating value. That's why Amazon Prime blew up.
(09:01) That's why Netflix is instant access. That's why the easiest way to enter a marketplace is to look at what everyone else is doing from a result standpoint and try and cut the time in half. Right? These are easy ways to provide value. And so they should be communicated in the naming of the offer so that our prospects can also overcome some of their biggest objections, which is how long is this going to take me? Is it going to be worth it? Well, if it only takes 10 seconds, it is going to be worth it for me and it's not going to
(09:21) take that long. So, my effort to sacrifice is low. Therefore, the value of this thing is higher. Right? And so, when we're thinking about this stuff, just as a as a final note to just drive this point home, if you were going to the dentist, right, a tooth extraction that takes 60 minutes is less valuable than one that takes five minutes, right? And so, value is very much communicated in time.
(09:39) And remember that telling someone that it's going to take longer is not necessarily more val. You don't want to sell more of your time. You want to get them to their goal faster. And so what you're what the amount of time that you give to them is independent is completely irrelevant to the outcome that they're trying to achieve.
(09:52) And so making sure that we always think about things in terms of time intervals, seconds, minutes, hours for the micro things, days, weeks, months for when they're going to achieve the larger transformation is how I like to think through these naming conventions. All right. So now that we know how to name the offers and the subpoints of the offers, what happens when promotions fatigue? So this is going to be a little bit more nuanced to uh niche markets and local markets, but what happens when your promotions fatigue? It's really
(10:13) important because especially in a local marketplace, you're going to run out of stuff quickly, right? You burn through the the marketplace fast. Kind of the double-edged sword of local marketing is that you it's easy to get to work and it's very hard to keep getting to work because you have to basically reinvent the wheel every 21 days.
(10:29) All right, so this is how to refresh promotions. This is kind of the order of operations that we look at. So, we try and do this in order of least operational drag to most operational drag. And that should make sense because we're trying to incur as little cost as possible when we're making these changes in our in our advertising.
(10:44) Right? So the first thing we'll do is we'll change the creative. All right? See these are the images and the pictures in your ads. Right? So you see the purple boxes here. These are both the exact same thing, the same program. It's just there's different creative. And so I don't need to change what I'm offering.
(10:56) I just need to change the video that's associated with it or the picture that's associated with my advertisement. So I can refresh that and run it again. The next thing I can do is change the body copy. So the actual words of the advertisement. I could have two ads, you know, if I if you have copy that works very well, you can keep refreshing the creative over and over again.
(11:12) Over time, though, you need to change the words. And so, this is kind of the next level down of operations. Takes a little bit more time to do that than changing the images and videos, which is why it's the second one in the order of operations. The third is changing the headline or the rapper of the offer. That's what we just literally went over. All right.
(11:25) So, that's, you know, changing your six week lean challenge to a six week tone challenge or changing it from a free six week, you know, weight loss thing to a free 42-day detox. Right? Those are the that's that's using time in that instance to change the interval, right? Another way is renaming the same thing like holiday hangover becomes new year, new year.
(11:41) Same time period, same season, etc. It's just another way of naming the same thing. And so, first thing we do is we don't change anything. Just change the images. Then we change the words. Then we change the headlines. All right. Now, the fourth thing is changing the duration of the offer. Now, there's two ways to do this.
(11:55) The first way is changing the metric that we're measuring with. So, an example of that would be, you know, one month turns to 28 days, right? More or less, right? Right? I mean, it's three days difference, but you get the idea, right? One month turns into four weeks. So, these are different metrics, but they still are the same thing.
(12:09) And the nice thing is that you don't have to change anything about your business, but it still makes your promotion fresh and new. All right, a different example. The second way of doing this is going from 1 month to 6 weeks. All right, so this is actually changing the duration of time of the promotion. That means you probably have to change some contracts, have to let the sales guys know, have to let your fulfillment team, etc.
(12:26) that these things are going to change. But these are things that will help in keeping your promotions fresh and regular. All right. Now, I put this other piece here just as a reminder that you could do 7 days, could be 164 hours, it could be 1 week. And sometimes changing those those metrics actually will make your offering so much more unique simply by changing time.
(12:44) And I hope you've you've noticed this repeated framing here is that time is a huge component of value and making sure that we name it properly and that we bucket that stuff can make it significantly more valuable and refresh it in the minds of our prospects. All right, the next one is changing the enhancer of your offer. All right, so that means adding a free component, adding a discounted component to the offering to make it more compelling.
(13:01) This is in order or the the the goal here is to get people who are otherwise on the edge who wouldn't take action to take action on the offer. Now, candidly, I'm not a big fan, and I've talked about this in the books of mild discounts. 10% off, 20% off. I don't think that changes buyer behavior.
(13:15) I don't think that gets someone to buy who otherwise wouldn't. I'm in in favor of free and massive discounts because those are the things that are going to drive people who are on the fence, who saw a promotion, and wouldn't otherwise have reacted, but then take action. Okay? So, if I had been running something like that for a while, then I might change my $1 trial to something that's free, like a free start or a free trial.
(13:33) I might change a $1 trial to 99% off. It might be the same thing, 99.2% off, something unique and different. A $1 trial might become no money down. So, these are all different ways that I could say the same thing. And so, what this does is it's changing the enhancer around the offer on its own, which will refresh the creative altogether.
(13:51) So, if you're stuck and you're not getting your ads aren't working, this is the this is the way that I outline it. Okay? And then the sixth thing that you can do, and this is the heaviest of all the types of changes you can do. I mean, the the fifth one, changing the the time period, uh it can be heavy, you got to change contracts, you know, you might have to add a couple weeks of fulfillment, things like that.
(14:07) But when you change the monetization structure, that is the hardest thing to do, right? That's really changing the core piece of your business. Now, for for context here, we change these things every seven days at the top. We change these things every, you know, two to three weeks. We change these things probably every quarter.
(14:21) We change the duration of our offer. We we don't change it that frequently. This might be, you know, once a year or twice a year. The enhancer in the offer that usually is a constant. And then finally, changing the monetization structure happens maybe every two to three years. It's very rare that we'll do that. And so once we have a monetization structure that works, which is the series of offers we give prospects and the price points associated with them, we usually we're not going to change that very much. Now, I have tons of trainings on
(14:44) monetization structure that have not come out yet. Hopefully, maybe when you watch this, they will be out at the at the moment of this making. This is the first training, so they are not out yet. But these are the things that we do in order to refresh promotions uh and programs without having to incur a lot of operational drag.
(14:58) All right? And so this is again very important for local businesses and niches. So the point of this video was to help you solve this problem of getting your, you know, advertising being tired of the programs that you have seeming uh stale. And so the goal here is to use the magic headline formula to make sure that your prospects know that it is for them and that it will solve their problem the way they want it to be solved.
(15:18) And that is the goal. All right? And so we're solving these problems. And that that last piece of the way they want it to be solved is going to be especially true for sub items and bonus items that you would include inside of a package. You know, like a 10-minute grocery calculator or uh you know, how to find properties in in 60 seconds or less.
(15:32) Those are things that are bonuses that are going to be pieces to the overarching transformation that someone likes to know. It's going to take a very small amount of time and provide a lot of return. All right. And so we've gone on on a long lovely journey together. We talked about how to find the right markets, how to charge what it's worth.
(15:46) We deconstructed value, reconstructed it, figured out the problems, figured out the solutions, figured out ways to provide those things in delivery vehicles that are high margin. That's where the delivery cube came in. Bonuses that we can do to further extend the value discrepancy between what people are buying, what they believe they're getting, guarantees associated with them, unconditional condition on how to stack those so that you can get people to say yes, the scarcity urgency to get them to say yes faster so you can
(16:07) decrease your cash conversion cycle, make it faster. And then finally, a magic game of formula to make sure that your promotions never st never go stale and that you'll never go hungry in your business and always name it in a way that people say that is for me. I will raise my hand. And so if this was cool for you, I have more free courses at acquisition.com.
(16:25) Candidly, I said this before, I'll say it again. We work with three to$10 million companies to help them scale and exit in three to five years and only have to get rich once. If you're below $3 million, my very transparent goal is to have you not have to ever buy anyone's stuff and just execute on these things. and the courses that my goal is to be better than the the high ticket coaching things that you get offered and the thousand $2,000 courses that you you have.
(16:45) I want to give it all away for free and it's candidly because I don't need your money. And so my my perfect world is you use this stuff, you build your company to 3 million, 5 million, 8 million and then you say, "Hey, Alex, it would be awesome if you could help us exit this for 50." Um, and that is where I would love to help you out with that because that is that is my goal.
(16:59) That's my that's what I love and I want everyone to be wealthy. So anyways, if you see anything when you get to that page that has locked, it's because I'm making these in real time. So, you don't have you don't have to pay anything to learn them. I'm making them as we go. Hopefully, by the time you watch this, nothing will be locked, but I'm trying as best I can to get all these out as we continue to run our portfolio companies and scale them.
(17:18) So, out of out of integrity to the companies that I work with, I have to make sure that I prioritize them. But I continue to give you the lessons and learnings that I take from them directly from the in the trenches so that you can use them in your business and grow. All right. So, um, if you are one of those guys, all you have to do is go to acquisition.
(17:32) com and you can see and enter your info in. And if if it seems like a good fit from what you entered, you know, one of my team will will reach back out and see if there's anything we can do to help. So, anyways, lots of love. Keep being amazing and I'll see you in the next course.
